 Title Page Protocol Title: A phase 1, first-in-human, 2-part, randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled, single ascending dose and sequential, open-label, multiple ascending dose study to evaluate the safety, tolerability, pharmacodynamics, and pharmacokinetics of VIS171 in healthy participants and participants with autoimmune disease(s) Protocol Number: VIS171-101 Compound: VIS171 Brief Title: A phase 1 study to evaluate the safety, tolerability, pharmacodynamics, and pharmacokinetics of VIS171 in healthy participants and in participants with autoimmune disease(s) Study Phase: Phase 1 Sponsor Name: Visterra Inc., an Otsuka subsidiary Legal Registered Address: 275 2nd Avenue, Waltham, MA 02451, United States of America Regulatory Agency Identifier Number(s) EudraCT: 2021-006246-12 Approval Date: 19 Nov 2021   95  1. Protocol Summary Synopsis Protocol Title: A phase 1, first-in-human, 2-part, randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled, single ascending dose and sequential, open-label, multiple ascending dose study to evaluate the safety, tolerability, pharmacodynamics, and pharmacokinetics of VIS171 in healthy participants and participants with autoimmune disease(s) Brief Title: A phase 1 study to evaluate the safety, tolerability, pharmacodynamics, and pharmacokinetics of VIS171 in healthy participants and in participants with autoimmune disease(s) Rationale: VIS171 is under development for the treatment of autoimmune diseases with an underlying mechanism attributed to T cell dysregulation. VIS171 is a fusion protein containing modified human interleukin-2 (IL-2) and a human antibody fragment crystallizable (Fc) domain. Nonclinical studies have demonstrated that VIS171 has a robust and specific effect on regulatory T cell (Treg) expansion. The purpose of this first-in-human (FIH) study is to assess the safety, tolerability, pharmacodynamics (PD), and pharmacokinetics (PK) of subcutaneous (SC) VIS171 in healthy participants (single ascending dose [SAD] - Part A) as well as in participants with autoimmune diseases (multiple ascending dose [MAD] - Part B). The autoimmune diseases that will be included in Part B (MAD) are systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE), autoimmune hepatitis (AIH), immune-mediated focal segmental glomerulosclerosis (FSGS), and alopecia areata (AA). These diseases share an underlying mechanism of diminished Treg responses contributing to disease pathogenesis and have been evaluated in prior clinical studies investigating low-dose recombinant or modified human IL-2. The data obtained from this FIH study will inform dose selection for subsequent clinical development and will help prioritize indications for further study. Objectives and Endpoints: The objectives and endpoints for Part A and Part B are summarized in the tables below. Objectives and Endpoints - Part A (Single Ascending Dose) Objectives Endpoints Primary:  To evaluate the safety and tolerability of VIS171. Primary:  Incidence and severity of TEAEs. Secondary:  To determine the PD effect of VIS171.  To assess the PK of VIS171. Secondary:  Mean fold change from baseline in immune cell types, including the following:  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of Treg.  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of helper T cells, cytotoxic T cells, and natural killer cells.  Pharmacokinetic parameters:  Cmax, tmax, AUClast, and AUC∞.  Objectives and Endpoints - Part A (Single Ascending Dose) Objectives Endpoints  To evaluate the immunogenicity of VIS171.  Characterization of ADA to VIS171 over time. Other:  To assess the effect of VIS171 on immune cell biology.  To assess the effect of VIS171 on plasma cytokine profiles. Other:  Change from baseline in immune cell types including, but not limited to, the following:  Expression levels (MFI) of FOXP3 and CD25.  Plasma cytokine levels. ADA = anti-drug antibody; AUC∞ = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to infinity; AUClast = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to the last observable concentration; CD = cluster of differentiation; Cmax = maximum (peak) serum drug concentration; FOXP3 = forkhead box protein P3; MFI = median fluorescence intensity; TEAE = treatment-emergent adverse event; tmax = time of maximum (peak) serum drug concentration. Objectives and Endpoints - Part B (Multiple Ascending Dose) Objectives Endpoints Primary:  To evaluate the safety and tolerability of VIS171. Primary:  Incidence and severity of TEAEs. Secondary:  To determine the PD effect of VIS171.  To assess the PK of VIS171.  To evaluate the immunogenicity of VIS171. Secondary:  Mean fold change from baseline in immune cell types, including the following:  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of Treg.  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of helper T cells, cytotoxic T cells, and natural killer cells.  Pharmacokinetic parameters:  Cmax, tmax, and AUCtau.  Characterization of ADA to VIS171 over time. Other:  To assess the effect of VIS171 on immune cell biology.  To assess the effect of VIS171 on plasma cytokine profiles.  To assess clinical response trends. Other:  Change from baseline in immune cell types stratified by indication including, but not limited to, the following:  Expression levels (MFI) of FOXP3 and CD25.  Plasma cytokine levels.  Assess Treg response trends across the 4 indications.  Assess relationships between Treg and early efficacy response trends across the 4 indications.  Objectives and Endpoints - Part B (Multiple Ascending Dose) Objectives Endpoints  To assess urine and blood biomarkers of disease state.  Assess initial clinical response trends in participants with immune-mediated diseases who have received up to 8 weeks of VIS171 therapy:  SLE:  Change from baseline in the SELENA-SLEDAI.  Change from baseline in uPCR and uACR as measured from first morning voided specimens.  Proportion of participants with uPCR < 0.5.  Change from baseline in eGFR.  Change from baseline in ds-DNA titers.  Change from baseline in C3, C4, and CH50.  AIH:  Change from baseline in serum ALT and AST levels.  Change in ALP:AST ratio and ALP:ALT ratio.  Change from baseline in total serum IgG levels.  FSGS:  Change from baseline in uPCR, measured from 24-hour urine collection.  Change from baseline in serum albumin level.  Number of participants achieving complete or partial remission.a  Change from baseline in eGFR.b  AA:  Change from baseline in the SALT score.  Change from baseline in eyelash and eyebrow growth, as assessed by the ClinRO.  Change from baseline in percentage of scalp affected based on standardized photography.  Change from baseline in markers of inflammation on scalp biopsy.c  Change in absolute values of urine and blood biomarkers of disease state over time. ALP = alkaline phosphatase; ALT = alanine transaminase; AST = aspartate transaminase; AUCtau = area under the concentration-time curve over the dosing interval at steady-state; CKD-EPI = Chronic Kidney Disease Epidemiology Collaboration; ClinRO = Clinician Reported Outcomes for eyelashes and eyebrows; ds-DNA = double-stranded deoxyribonucleic acid; eGFR = estimated glomerular filtration rate; IgG = immunoglobulin G; SALT = Severity of Alopecia Tool; SELENA-SLEDAI = Safety of Estrogens in Lupus Erythematosus: National Assessment-Systemic Lupus Erythematosus Disease Activity Index; uACR = urine albumin/creatinine ratio; uPCR = urine protein-to-creatinine ratio. aComplete remission is defined as a reduction of proteinuria to < 0.3 g/d or < 300 mg/g (< 30 mg/mmol), normal serum creatinine, and serum albumin > 3.5 g/dL (35 g/L); partial remission is defined as a reduction of proteinuria to 0.3 - 3.5 g/d (300 - 3500 mg/g [30 - 350 mg/mmol]) and stable serum creatinine (increase in serum creatinine < 25%). bEstimated glomerular filtration rate will be calculated using the CKD-EPI formula (2021). cApplicable only for participants who consent to the scalp biopsy.  Study Design: This is a phase 1, multicenter, 2-part combined SAD and MAD FIH study to investigate the safety, tolerability, PD, and PK of SC VIS171 in healthy participants (Part A - SAD) and in participants with an autoimmune inflammatory disease(s) (SLE, AIH, FSGS, or AA) (Part B - MAD). For Part A, participants will be enrolled at a single study site in New Zealand. For Part B, participants will be enrolled from approximately 20 study sites in up to 10 countries. Number of Participants: In Part A, approximately 40 healthy participants (5 cohorts of 8 participants) will be randomly assigned to study intervention. In Part B, up to 36 participants (3 cohorts of 12 participants) with an autoimmune disease will be enrolled. During the study, additional participants may be included. The addition of participants would be subject to Safety Monitoring Committee (SMC) review. Intervention Groups and Duration: In Part A, participants in each cohort will receive a single SC dose of VIS171 or placebo on Day 1. The starting dose in Part A is 1 μg/kg. The proposed doses for Part A are 1, 4, 8, 16, and 32 μg/kg in Cohorts 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5, respectively. The dosing frequency in Cohorts 1 and 2 in Part B will be once every 2 weeks for 8 weeks (total of 4 doses). The doses for Cohorts 1 and 2 in Part B will be derived from Part A. The dosing frequency for Cohort 3 in Part B will be determined from Cohorts 1 and 2 of Part B, and may be increased to once every week for 8 weeks (up to 8 doses). Summary of Key Inclusion and Exclusion Criteria: Inclusion Criteria Male or female participant between 18 and 55 years of age, inclusive, at the screening visit (Part A and Part B [participants with AIH, FSGS, and AA]) or between 18 and 75 years of age, inclusive, at the screening visit (Part B [participants with SLE]). Body mass index between 17 and 35 kg/m2, inclusive, at the screening visit. Additional inclusion criteria:  Part A: Healthy, as determined by prestudy medical evaluation (medical history, physical examination, vital signs, 12-lead electrocardiogram, and clinical laboratory evaluations), as judged by the principal investigator.  Part B (participants with SLE only): Diagnosis of adult SLE according to the 2019 American College of Rheumatology classification criteria for at least 6 months prior to signing the informed consent form (ICF) and an estimated glomerular filtration rate (eGFR) ≥ 30 mL/min/1.73 m2 (calculated using the Chronic Kidney Disease Epidemiology Collaboration [CKD-EPI] formula [2021]).  Part B (participants with AIH only): Adult meeting criteria for autoimmune hepatitis (simplified diagnostic criteria) and must have completed induction therapy with standard of care (eg, steroids) and be on maintenance therapy (eg, azathioprine and/or low dose steroids).   Part B (participants with FSGS only): History of biopsy-proven FSGS or minimal change disease, at least one prior episode of nephrotic syndrome (defined as 24-hour urine protein > 3.5 g/day and serum albumin < 3.0 g/dL), and at least one prior episode of partial or complete remission in response to corticosteroid therapy. Estimated glomerular filtration rate ≥ 30 mL/min/1.73 m2. At screening, 24-hour urine protein ≥ 1 g/day or urine protein/creatinine ratio (uPCR) > 0.75 g/g.  Part B (participants with AA only): Severity of Alopecia Tool score between 25 and 95 at screening. Current episode of AA is > 24 weeks (without evidence of spontaneous terminal hair regrowth at the time of screening and first treatment, ie, no more than 10% regrowth), but ≤ 5 years (from onset of current episode of severe scalp hair loss). Key Exclusion Criteria Receipt of high dose corticosteroid therapy within 4 weeks prior to screening as either (a) intravenous (IV) pulse corticosteroid therapy or (b) daily oral corticosteroid therapy of ≥ 1 mg/kg or 80 mg/day prednisone (or equivalent), receipt of belimumab within 6 months prior to screening, history of treatment with rituximab or ocrelizumab (or other B cell-depleting agent) within 12 months prior to screening, history of cytotoxic medications (eg, cyclophosphamide) within the preceding 12 months, and receipt of blood products within 6 months prior to screening. Participants with uncontrolled hypertension (systolic blood pressure [SBP] > 140 mmHg, diastolic blood pressure [DBP] > 90 mmHg in any position) or symptomatic hypotension, any chronic infectious disease, or participants with a positive urine drug or alcohol breath screen test result at screening or Day −1. Current symptoms of infection, diagnosis of Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) (reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction [RT-PCR], antigen testing, or clinical diagnosis) in 21 days prior to screening, or ongoing diagnosis of ‘Long-COVID’ symptoms due to a prior COVID-19 infection. Received a vaccination, other than COVID-19 vaccination, during the 30 days prior to administration of the first dose of study intervention. A COVID-19 vaccination cannot be received within 7 days prior to the first dose of study intervention and until 14 days after the last dose. Additional exclusion criteria:  Part B (participants with SLE only): Presence of life- or organ-threatening manifestations of lupus requiring intense immunosuppressive therapy, organ support systems, or plasmapheresis. Lupus cerebritis, or active severe or unstable neuropsychiatric SLE.  Part B (participants with AIH only): Advanced cirrhosis/liver disease.   Part B (participants with FSGS only): Steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome defined as absence of complete or partial remission following at least 12 weeks of full dose corticosteroid therapy. Known secondary causes of FSGS (eg, genetic/familial, viral, reflux uropathy, toxic causes [eg, bisphosphonates]).  Part B (participants with AA only): Participant has concomitant hair loss of another form, including but not limited to traction alopecia, central centrifugal cicatricial alopecia, lichen planopilaris, frontal fibrosing alopecia, or androgenetic alopecia. Presence of other severe autoimmune diseases – requiring additional immunosuppressive treatment.  Schema Figure 2.1-1 Study Design Schematic Note: For Part B Cohort 1, the study progression is based on the SAD cohort demonstrating ~2-fold Treg expansion. For Part B Cohort 2, the study progression is based on the SAD cohort demonstrating ~5-fold Treg expansion.   β-hCG = beta-human chorionic gonadotropin; AE = adverse event; CBC = complete blood count; D = Day; ECG = electrocardiogram; ET = early termination; HIPAA = Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act; HIV = human immunodeficiency virus; N/A = not applicable; PBMC = peripheral blood mononuclear cells; uACR = urine albumin/creatinine ratio. Note: All assessments and blood draws have a ± 10-minute window, unless otherwise specified. aThe Day 6 visit assessments should be performed within 96 to 144 hours after dosing. bAll participants will be discharged on Day 4, approximately 72 hours after dosing. Discharge from the study center will not occur prior to performing the 72-hour post-injection study procedures. cThe full physical examination will be an assessment of general appearance and an evaluation of skin, head, eyes (excluding fundoscopic examination of retinae), ears, nose and throat, chest and abdomen (excluding rectal examination), extremities, and musculoskeletal system. The brief physical examination will be an assessment of the general appearance, skin, cardiovascular system, respiratory system, and abdomen. dVital signs at screening and Day −1 will include height and weight, blood pressure, heart rate, respiratory rate, and temperature. Vital signs at other time points will be limited to temperature (Day −1 or Day 1 predose only), blood pressure, heart rate, and respiratory rate. Vital signs measurements on Day 1 will be recorded within 30 minutes prior to the SC injection and then at 1 and 2 hours postinjection. On subsequent visits, vital signs will be recorded, as possible, at approximately the same time of day, if convenient. eOn Day 1, ECGs will be done within 30 to 60 minutes prior to the SC injection. Additional ECGs may be conducted at any time during the study based on the investigator’s judgment. fThe investigator or trained, qualified designee will assess the injection site for local tolerability at 1 and 4 hours postdose (Day 1), 24 hours postdose (Day 2), and on Day 3. gSamples to be collected at 24 hours following the injection on Day 1.  hAll uACR and uPCR must be collected from the first morning voided specimens. iOn the day of the SC injection (Day 1), blood samples for PK analysis will be collected prior to the start of the injection and at 2, 6, 24 (Day 2), and 48 (Day 3) hours postinjection. All participants will also have PK samples drawn on Days 4, 6, 9, 15, 22, and 29. jCytokines included in the panel will be listed in the laboratory manual. kSampling time for future analysis of PD biomarkers such as cytokines or other markers that might be considered useful to screen for unexpected responses to VIS171 injection will be drawn immediately following and 2 hours postinjection on Day 1.   Note: All assessments and blood draws have a ± 10-minute window, unless otherwise specified. aThese visit assessments should be performed within 96 to 144 hours after the most recent dose. bDepending on what day the Day 43 study visit falls on, the Day 44, 45, and 46 study visits should follow consecutively. cThe full physical examination will be an assessment of general appearance and an evaluation of skin, head, eyes (excluding fundoscopic examination of retinae), ears, nose and throat, chest and abdomen (excluding rectal examination), extremities, and musculoskeletal system. The brief physical examination will be an assessment of the general appearance, skin, cardiovascular system, respiratory system, and abdomen. dVital signs at screening and Day −1 will include height and weight, blood pressure, heart rate, respiratory rate, and temperature. Vital signs at other time points will be limited to temperature (Day 1 pre-dose only), blood pressure, heart rate, and respiratory rate. Vital signs measurements on dosing days will be recorded within 30 minutes prior to the SC injection and then at 1 and 2 hours postinjection. On non-dosing days, vital signs will be recorded, as possible, at approximately the same time of day, if convenient.  eAn ECG will be done within 30 to 60 minutes prior to the SC injection on Day 1 and then on Day 2. Additional ECGs may be conducted at any time during the study based on the investigator’s judgment. fThe dosing frequency may be increased to once weekly for Cohort 3. gThe investigator or trained, qualified designee will assess the injection site for local tolerability. hSamples to be collected 24 hours following the injection on Day 1. iAll uPCR and uACR must be collected from the first morning voided specimens. jOn the dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43), blood samples for PK analysis will be collected prior to the start of the injection. On Days 1 and 43 only, samples will also be drawn at 2 and 6 hours postdose. All participants will also have PK samples drawn on Days 2 (24-hours postinjection), 3, 4, 6, 9, 20, 34, 44 (24-hours postinjection), 45, 46, 48, 51, 58, and 71. kCytokines included in the panel will be listed in the laboratory manual. lSampling time for future analysis of PD biomarkers such as cytokines or other markers that might be considered useful to screen for unexpected responses to VIS171 injection will be drawn predose as well as immediately following and 2 hours postinjection on each dosing day (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43). mBlood samples for ADA should be taken predose on dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43).   LFT = liver function test. Note: All assessments and blood draws have a ± 10-minute window, unless otherwise specified. aThese visit assessments should be performed within 96 to 144 hours after the most recent dose. bDepending on what day the Day 43 study visit falls on, the Day 44, 45, and 46 study visits should follow consecutively. cThe full physical examination will be an assessment of general appearance and an evaluation of skin, head, eyes (excluding fundoscopic examination of retinae), ears, nose and throat, chest and abdomen (excluding rectal examination), extremities, and musculoskeletal system. The brief physical examination will be an assessment of the general appearance, skin, cardiovascular system, respiratory system, and abdomen. dVital signs at screening and Day −1 will include height and weight, blood pressure, heart rate, respiratory rate, and temperature. Vital signs at other time points will be limited to temperature (Day 1 pre-dose only), blood pressure, heart rate, and respiratory rate. Vital signs measurements on dosing days will be recorded within 30 minutes prior to the SC injection and then at 1 and 2 hours postinjection. On non-dosing days, vital signs will be recorded, as possible, at approximately the same time of day, if convenient. eAn ECG will be done within 30 to 60 minutes prior to the SC injection on Day 1 and then on Day 2. Additional ECGs may be conducted at any time during the study based on the investigator’s judgment. fThe dosing frequency may be increased to once weekly for Cohort 3.  gThe investigator or trained, qualified designee will assess the injection site for local tolerability. hSamples to be collected 24 hours following the injection on Day 1. iAll uACR must be collected from the first morning voided specimens. jOn the dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43), blood samples for PK analysis will be collected prior to the start of the injection. On Days 1 and 43 only, samples will also be drawn at 2 and 6 hours postdose. All participants will also have PK samples drawn on Days 2 (24-hours postdose), 3, 4, 6, 9, 20, 34, 44 (24-hours postdose), 45, 46, 48, 51, 58, and 71. kCytokines included in the panel will be listed in the laboratory manual. lSampling time for future analysis of PD biomarkers such as cytokines or other markers that might be considered useful to screen for unexpected responses to VIS171 injection will be drawn predose as well as immediately following and 2 hours postinjection on each dosing day (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43). mBlood samples for ADA should be taken predose on dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43).   Note: All assessments and blood draws have a ± 10-minute window, unless otherwise specified. aThese visit assessments should be performed within 96 to 144 hours after the most recent dose. bDepending on what day the Day 43 study visit falls on, the Day 44, 45, and 46 study visits should follow consecutively. cThe full physical examination will be an assessment of general appearance and an evaluation of skin, head, eyes (excluding fundoscopic examination of retinae), ears, nose and throat, chest and abdomen (excluding rectal examination), extremities, and musculoskeletal system. The brief physical examination will be an assessment of the general appearance, skin, cardiovascular system, respiratory system, and abdomen. dVital signs at screening and Day 1 pre-dose will include height and weight, blood pressure, heart rate, respiratory rate, and temperature. Vital signs at other time points will be limited to temperature (Day 1 pre-dose only), blood pressure, heart rate, and respiratory rate. Vital signs measurements on dosing days will be recorded within 30 minutes prior to the SC injection and then at 1 and 2 hours postinjection. On non-dosing days, vital signs will be recorded, as possible, at approximately the same time of day, if convenient. eAn ECG will be done within 30 to 60 minutes prior to the SC injection on Day 1 and then on Day 2. Additional ECGs may be conducted at any time during the study based on the investigator’s judgment. fThe dosing frequency may be increased to once weekly for Cohort 3.  gThe investigator or trained, qualified designee will assess the injection site for local tolerability. hSamples to be collected 24 hours following the injection on Day 1. iThe uPCR at screening and on Day 58 will be from the 24-hour urine sample, all other uPCR must be collected from the first morning voided specimens. jOn the dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43), blood samples for PK analysis will be collected prior to the start of the injection. On Days 1 and 43 only, samples will also be drawn at 2 and 6 hours postdose. All participants will also have PK samples drawn on Days 2 (24-hours postdose), 3, 4, 6, 9, 20, 34, 44 (24-hours postdose), 45, 46, 48, 51, 58, and 71. kCytokines included in the panel will be listed in the laboratory manual. lSampling time for future analysis of PD biomarkers such as cytokines or other markers that might be considered useful to screen for unexpected responses to VIS171 injection will be drawn predose as well as immediately following and 2 hours postinjection on each dosing day (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43). mBlood samples for ADA should be taken predose on dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43).   ClinRO = Clinician Reported Outcomes for eyelashes and eyebrows. Note: All assessments and blood draws have a ± 10-minute window, unless otherwise specified. aThese visit assessments should be performed within 96 to 144 hours after the most recent dose. bDepending on what day the Day 43 study visit falls on, the Day 44, 45, and 46 study visits should follow consecutively. cThe full physical examination will be an assessment of general appearance and an evaluation of skin, head, eyes (excluding fundoscopic examination of retinae), ears, nose and throat, chest and abdomen (excluding rectal examination), extremities, and musculoskeletal system. The brief physical examination will be an assessment of the general appearance, skin, cardiovascular system, respiratory system, and abdomen. dVital signs at screening and Day 1 pre-dose will include height and weight, blood pressure, heart rate, respiratory rate, and temperature. Vital signs at other time points will be limited to temperature (Day 1 pre-dose only), blood pressure, heart rate, and respiratory rate. Vital signs measurements on dosing days will be recorded within 30 minutes prior to the SC injection and then at 1 and 2 hours postinjection. On non-dosing days, vital signs will be recorded, as possible, at approximately the same time of day, if convenient.  eAn ECG will be done within 30 to 60 minutes prior to the SC injection on Day 1 and then on Day 2. Additional ECGs may be conducted at any time during the study based on the investigator’s judgment. fThe dosing frequency may be increased to once weekly for Cohort 3. gThe investigator or trained, qualified designee will assess the injection site for local tolerability. hSamples to be collected 24 hours following the injection on Day 1. iAll uACR must be collected from the first morning voided specimens. jOn the dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43), blood samples for PK analysis will be collected prior to the start of the injection. On Days 1 and 43 only, samples will also be drawn at 2 and 6 hours postdose. All participants will also have PK samples drawn on Days 2 (24-hours postdose) 3, 4, 6, 9, 20, 34, 44 (24-hours postdose), 45, 46, 48, 51, 58, and 71. kCytokines included in the panel will be listed in the laboratory manual. lSampling time for future analysis of PD biomarkers such as cytokines or other markers that might be considered useful to screen for unexpected responses to VIS171 injection will be drawn predose as well as immediately following and 2 hours postinjection on each dosing day (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43). mBlood samples for ADA should be taken predose on dosing days (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43).  2. Introduction VIS171 is under development for the treatment of autoimmune diseases with an underlying mechanism attributed to T cell dysregulation including systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE), immune-mediated focal segmental glomerulosclerosis (FSGS), autoimmune hepatitis (AIH), and alopecia areata (AA). VIS171 is a fusion protein containing modified human interleukin-2 (IL-2) and a human antibody fragment crystallizable (Fc) domain. 2.1. Study Rationale Nonclinical studies have demonstrated that VIS171 has a robust and specific effect on regulatory T cell (Treg) expansion. The purpose of this first-in-human (FIH) study is to assess the safety, tolerability, pharmacodynamics (PD), and pharmacokinetics (PK) of subcutaneous (SC) VIS171 in healthy participants (single ascending dose [SAD] - Part A) as well as in participants with autoimmune diseases (multiple ascending dose [MAD] - Part B). The autoimmune diseases that will be included in Part B (MAD) are SLE, AIH, immune-mediated FSGS, and AA (see the inclusion and exclusion criteria in Section 5.1 and Section 5.2, respectively). These diseases share an underlying mechanism of diminished Treg responses contributing to disease pathogenesis and have been evaluated in prior clinical studies investigating low-dose recombinant or modified human IL-2.1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9 The data obtained from this FIH study will inform dose selection for subsequent clinical development and will help prioritize indications for further study. 2.3. Benefit/Risk Assessment The sponsor has considered the risks and benefits as presented below. 2.3.1. Risk Assessment VIS171 has not been evaluated in humans. The active component of VIS171, IL-2, has been investigated in a clinical setting for over 30 years and has a well-understood safety profile at a wide range of doses. Recombinant human IL-2 (aldesleukin) has been a Food and Drug Administration-approved therapy for metastatic melanoma and metastatic renal carcinoma since 1992. Furthermore, in the past 30 years, there has been an appreciation for the opportunity for low-dose IL-2 regimens to treat autoimmune diseases prompting many academic and exploratory studies. It is documented that IL-2 (high-dose infusion regimens) used in oncology treatment can cause a reaction that may include dermatologic toxicity, low blood pressure, increased heart rate or arrhythmias, shortness of breath, nausea, diarrhea and joint and muscle stiffness.   Dermatologic toxicity caused by higher doses of IL-2 generally manifests as erythema, and pruritus that can develop on the face and neck and progress to the trunk. Participants in this study will be reminded to protect their skin from extreme sun exposure, harsh lotions or detergents, and other skin irritants while participating in the study.13  High-dose IL-2 therapy has been associated with reversible reduction in kidney function, attributed at least in part to hemodynamic changes resulting in acute kidney injury.14,15,16 In vitro studies have indicated the potential for IL-2 to harm podocytes. Notably, however, the Protein Atlas suggests that IL-2 receptor is minimally expressed on healthy human podocytes.17 A meta-analysis concluded that low-dose recombinant IL-2 administered subcutaneously had a favorable safety profile, and did not identify kidney injury as a parameter of concern.13 While the sponsor does not believe low-dose modified IL-2 (VIS171) carries a risk of kidney injury, healthy participants will be monitored closely for the development of nonorthostatic albuminuria. Studies with low-dose IL-2 consistently found reduced toxicity relative to high-dose treatment, as demonstrated by a lack of serious adverse events (SAEs) in the majority of low-dose studies.2,6,9,18 The safety of VIS171 was determined in vivo in 2 non-GLP and 2 GLP studies in cynomolgus monkeys and rats. Cynomolgus monkeys are relevant for evaluating VIS171 safety as well as pharmacological activity, based on similar binding profiles of human and cynomolgus monkey IL-2 and its receptors. Rats have been used historically to assess the safety of IL-2-containing compounds, and VIS171 is active in rats. VIS171 was well tolerated in cynomolgus monkeys and rats. In the GLP studies, animals were dosed once weekly for 12 weeks in the rat study and 8 weeks in the cynomolgus monkey study. The NOAELs were determined to be 6000 µg/kg in the GLP rat study and 300 µg/kg in the GLP cynomolgus monkey study. In the cynomolgus monkey study dermatological reactions were observed in a dose dependent fashion. All were monitorable and resolved when treatment was discontinued. There were no VIS171-related changes to urinalysis parameters. The potential for VIS171 to stimulate cytokine release was evaluated in an in vitro cytokine release assay using whole blood and in each in vivo study conducted. Overall, the in vitro human whole blood assays and the in vivo cynomolgus monkey data both indicated that VIS171 has a low risk for cytokine release in humans. Monitoring for potential adverse events (AEs) is incorporated into the design of this study through safety assessments of physical examinations, vital sign measurements,  electrocardiograms (ECGs), clinical laboratory assessments (hematology, serum chemistry, coagulation, urinalysis, urine albumin/creatinine ratio [uACR; Part A and Part B (participants with AIH and AA)], and urine protein/creatinine ratio [uPCR; Part A]), and AE solicitation. Brief physical examinations will include evaluations of the skin, so that the skin is frequently observed and any risk is identified early. As described in Section 4.1.1 (Part A) and Section 4.1.2 (Part B), a Safety Monitoring Committee (SMC) will be reviewing all available safety data and PD data during this study prior to each dose escalation and prior to the start of Part B. 2.3.1.1. Coronavirus Disease 2019 Risk The potential for VIS171 to interact with SARS-CoV-2 or the respective vaccines for SARS-CoV-2 is unknown. In response to the Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) pandemic and to prepare for possible quarantines, site closures, travel limitations etc., the sponsor, in consultation with clinical investigators and Institutional Review Boards (IRBs)/Independent Ethics Committees (IECs), may determine that the protection of a participant’s safety, welfare, and rights is best served by home health visits, telemedicine, or other remote support. Local regulations will be followed. Clinical sites participating in this study will be allowed to follow their own site practice guidelines to ensure safety for site staff and participants. It is possible that, with the escalation of the pandemic, local circumstances lead to a local change in risk assessment, therefore the need to implement additional measures may arise, and an investigator- driven risk assessment might be necessary. This assessment should be documented in the investigator’s site master file and communicated to the sponsor. A COVID-19 vaccination cannot be received within 7 days prior to the first dose of study intervention and until 14 days after the last dose. Participants with current symptoms of COVID-19 infection, a diagnosis of COVID-19 in the 21 days prior to screening, or ongoing diagnosis of “Long-COVID” symptoms due to a prior COVID-19 infection will be excluded from participation in the study. Participant safety is of upmost importance and the sponsor will provide stipends, per national laws and local regulations, to ensure participant safety. 2.3.2. Benefit Assessment A direct health benefit from receipt of the study intervention has not been yet been established in humans; however, data from this study will contribute to the development of VIS171.  The sponsor intends to develop VIS171 for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. VIS171 was designed to extend the half-life of IL-2 to improve the durability of the IL-2 response at low doses while preferentially binding to the trimeric receptor to stimulate Treg response instead of Teff response, effectively reducing the undesirable side effects associated with other low-dose IL-2 therapy. 2.3.3. Overall Benefit: Risk Conclusion The sponsor has carefully considered the risks and benefits. In light of the experience of other low-dose IL-2 products and the measures taken to understand and minimize risk to participants participating in this study, the potential risks identified in association with VIS171 are justified.  3. Objectives and Endpoints The objectives and endpoints are summarized in Table 3-1 for Part A and in Table 3-2 for Part B. Table 3-1 Objectives and Endpoints - Part A (Single Ascending Dose) Objectives Endpoints Primary:  To evaluate the safety and tolerability of VIS171. Primary:  Incidence and severity of TEAEs. Secondary:  To determine the PD effect of VIS171.  To assess the PK of VIS171.  To evaluate the immunogenicity of VIS171. Secondary:  Mean fold change from baseline in immune cell types, including the following:  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of Treg.  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of helper T cells, cytotoxic T cells, and NK cells.  Pharmacokinetic parameters:  Cmax, tmax, AUClast, and AUC∞.  Characterization of ADA to VIS171 over time. Other:  To assess the effect of VIS171 on immune cell biology.  To assess the effect of VIS171 on plasma cytokine profiles. Other:  Change from baseline in immune cell types including, but not limited to, the following:  Expression levels (MFI) of FOXP3 and CD25.  Plasma cytokine levels. ADA = anti-drug antibody; AUC∞ = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to infinity; AUClast = area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to the last observable concentration; Cmax = maximum (peak) serum drug concentration; MFI = median fluorescence intensity; NK = natural killer; TEAE = treatment-emergent adverse event; tmax = time of maximum (peak) serum drug concentration.  Table 3-2 Objectives and Endpoints - Part B (Multiple Ascending Dose) Objectives Endpoints Primary:  To evaluate the safety and tolerability of VIS171. Primary:  Incidence and severity of TEAEs. Secondary:  To determine the PD effect of VIS171.  To assess the PK of VIS171.  To evaluate the immunogenicity of VIS171. Secondary:  Mean fold change from baseline in immune cell types, including the following:  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of Treg.  Absolute number (cells/μL) and frequency (%) of helper T cells, cytotoxic T cells, and natural killer cells.  Pharmacokinetic parameters:  Cmax, tmax, and AUCtau.  Characterization of ADA to VIS171 over time. Other:  To assess the effect of VIS171 on immune cell biology.  To assess the effect of VIS171 on plasma cytokine profiles.  To assess clinical response trends. Other:  Change from baseline in immune cell types stratified by indication including, but not limited to, the following:  Expression levels (MFI) of FOXP3 and CD25.  Plasma cytokine levels.  Assess Treg response trends across the 4 indications.  Assess relationships between Treg and early efficacy response trends across the 4 indications.  Assess initial clinical response trends in participants with immune-mediated diseases who have received up to 8 weeks of VIS171 therapy:  SLE:  Change from baseline in the SELENA-SLEDAI.  Change from baseline in uPCR and uACR as measured from first morning voided specimens  Proportion of participants with uPCR < 0.5.  Change from baseline in eGFR.  Change from baseline in ds-DNA titers.  Change from baseline in C3, C4, and CH50.  AIH:  Change from baseline in serum ALT and AST levels.  Change in ALP:AST ratio and ALP:ALT ratio.  Change from baseline in total serum IgG levels.  Objectives Endpoints  To assess urine and blood biomarkers of disease state.  FSGS:  Change from baseline in uPCR, measured from 24-hour urine collection.  Change from baseline in serum albumin level.  Number of participants achieving complete or partial remission.a  Change from baseline in eGFR.b  AA:  Change from baseline in the SALT score.  Change from baseline in eyelash and eyebrow growth, as assessed by the ClinRO.  Change from baseline in percentage of scalp affected based on standardized photography.  Change from baseline in markers of inflammation on scalp biopsy.c  Change in urine and blood biomarkers of disease state. ALP = alkaline phosphatase; ALT = alanine transaminase; AST = aspartate transaminase; AUCtau = area under the concentration-time curve over the dosing interval at steady-state; CKD-EPI = Chronic Kidney Disease Epidemiology Collaboration; ClinRO = Clinician Reported Outcomes for eyelashes and eyebrows; ds-DNA = double-stranded deoxyribonucleic acid; eGFR = estimated glomerular filtration rate; SALT = Severity of Alopecia Tool; SELENA-SLEDAI = Safety of Estrogens in Lupus Erythematosus: National Assessment-Systemic Lupus Erythematosus Disease Activity Index. aComplete remission is defined as a reduction of proteinuria to < 0.3 g/day or < 300 mg/g (< 30 mg/mmol), normal serum creatinine, and serum albumin > 3.5 g/dL (35 g/L); partial remission is defined as a reduction of proteinuria to 0.3 to 3.5 g/day (300 - 3500 mg/g [30 - 350 mg/mmol]) and stable serum creatinine (increase in serum creatinine < 25%). bEstimated glomerular filtration rate will be calculated using the CKD-EPI formula (2021). cApplicable only for participants who consent to the scalp biopsy. 4. Study Design 4.1. Overall Design This is a phase 1, multicenter, 2-part combined SAD and MAD FIH study to investigate the safety, tolerability, PD, and PK of SC VIS171 in healthy participants (Part A - SAD) and in participants with an autoimmune inflammatory disease(s) (SLE, AIH, FSGS, or AA) (Part B -MAD). For Part A, participants will be enrolled at a single study site in New Zealand. For Part B, participants will be enrolled from approximately 20 study sites in up to 10 countries.  4.1.1. Part A Part A is a randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled SAD assessment of SC VIS171 in healthy participants. Up to 5 cohorts are planned, each comprising 8 participants (6 VIS171 and 2 placebo). If feasible, 2 healthy participants of Japanese ancestry are encouraged to be enrolled in each cohort (although this is not mandatory). A participant will be considered to be of Japanese ancestry based on verbal confirmation of familial heritage (a participant’s 4 grandparents were born in Japan and recognized to be ‘Japanese’). Additional cohort(s) may be added if insufficient Treg expansion is observed (see Table 4.1.1-1). Randomization to VIS171 or placebo will occur on Day 1, after screening and all inclusion/exclusion criteria are confirmed to be met. Participants will be administered SC VIS171 (or placebo) in the study center on Day 1. Initial dosing in at least the first 3 cohorts (Part A) will be limited to 3 participants (2 VIS171 and 1 placebo) who will serve as ‘sentinel participants’ to be observed for potential severe/serious AEs. Subsequent dosing of remaining participants from the cohort only proceed after 24 hours of observation of the initial 3 participants has been completed. Participants will be discharged on Day 4, approximately 72 hours after dosing. The follow-up period after dosing will be 28 days. Procedures related to the clinical study are detailed in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 2.1-1). Participants will first be enrolled in Cohort 1 (Part A) and the proposed starting dose is 1 μg/kg. Escalation to the next dosing level cohort will occur after review of safety and PD data by the SMC (see Section 10.1.4). The SMC will convene when 100% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days in that cohort. Pharmacokinetic data will not be required in the dose escalation decision for each cohort. Assessment of safety and tolerability will be determined by the SMC through evaluation of treatment-emergent adverse events (TEAEs), vital signs, and clinical laboratory tests. Dose escalation will be conditional based on the characteristics, toxicity grade (as defined in the United States Food and Drug Administration Guidance for Industry “Toxicity Grading Scale for Healthy Adult and Adolescent Volunteers Enrolled in Preventive Vaccine Trials”)19 and/or number of TEAEs or serious TEAEs observed. Stopping criteria for dose escalation are described in  Section 7.1. The PD data (Treg/CD4+) will also be reviewed by the SMC. Dose escalation will be determined as summarized in Table 4.1.1-1. Table 4.1.1-1 Criteria for Dose Escalation - Part A Study Progression Dose Selection Process Trigger for SMC Analysis Criteria for Escalation SAD Cohort X to SAD Cohort X+1 Initial dose determined from PK/PD modeling; subsequent doses determined based on the observed expansion of Tregs (%Treg/CD4+) in SAD Cohort X and safety. 100% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days in SAD Cohort X  SMC determines acceptable safety profile to proceed based on Cohort X data  SMC approval of dose for Cohort X+1 If the dose is found to be reasonably safe and tolerable, the decision will be made to proceed to the next cohort. The SMC may decide to increase, decrease, or dose at the same level for each subsequent cohort; however, the dose increase between any 2 sequential cohorts will not exceed 4-fold and the maximum dose will not exceed 100 μg/kg. The estimated dose levels for Cohorts 1 to 5 (Part A) are summarized in Table 4.1.1-2. Table 4.1.1-2 Planned Cohorts - Part A Cohorts Dose level Cohort 1 1 μg/kg Cohort 2 4 μg/kg Cohort 3 8 μg/kg Cohort 4 16 μg/kg Cohort 5 32 μg/kg The total duration of the clinical study for each participant will be up to approximately 57 days, including the following:  A screening visit up to 28 days before dosing (Days −28 to −1)  An in-clinic stay of approximately 3 to 4 days, with admission to the study center on Day −1, dosing on Day 1, and discharge on Day 4  A post-administration period of 28 days with follow-up visits on Days 6, 9 (± 2 days), 15 (± 3 days), and 22 (± 3 days)  A final follow-up visit on Day 29 (± 3 days). 4.1.2. Part B Part B is an open-label, MAD basket assessment of SC VIS171 in participants with an autoimmune inflammatory disease (SLE, AIH, FSGS, and/or AA). Two to 3 cohorts are planned, each comprising 12 participants. In Cohorts 1 and 2, at least 2 participants per  indication will be enrolled. For each of the 4 indications at least 2 participants are required to be enrolled in each cohort, and an additional 4 participants from any of the 4 indications will be enrolled for a total of 12 participants in each of Cohorts 1 and 2. Enrollment for Cohort 3 may be flexible with respect to the indications and the number of participants per indication. Initiation of each cohort will be contingent on demonstration of (a) safety profiles deemed acceptable by the SMC in Part A (SAD), including Part A cohort(s) that evaluated the dose level (or higher) to be used in Part B (MAD), and (b) SMC review of the prior Part B cohort (for Part B Cohorts 2 and 3, when ≥ 50% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days following the last dose in that cohort, as described below). Participants will be administered SC VIS171 in the study center and have assessments performed during ambulatory visits as per the Schedules of Assessment (Table 1.3-2 [SLE], Table 1.3-3 [AIH], Table 1.3-4 [FSGS], and Table 1.3-5 [AA]). The dose for Cohorts 1 and 2 (Part B) will be derived from Part A, as described below. The dose for Cohort 3 (Part B) will be derived from Part A and earlier cohorts in Part B. The dosing frequency in Cohorts 1 and 2 (Part B) will be once every 2 weeks for 8 weeks. The dosing frequency in Cohort 3 (Part B) will be once every 2 weeks for 8 weeks but may be increased to once every week for 8 weeks. The follow-up period after the last dose will be 28 days. Initiation of Part B and escalation to the next dosing level cohort within Part B will occur after review of the available safety data by the SMC. The SMC will convene for the cohorts when ≥ 50% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days following the last dose in that cohort. Safety data available for review will include, but is not limited to, TEAEs, vital signs, and clinical laboratory tests. Stopping criteria for dose escalation are described in Section 7.1. The SMC will evaluate safety and is required to review and approve dose selection for the next cohort. Dose escalation will be determined as summarized in Table 4.1.2-1.  Table 4.1.2-1 Criteria for Dose Escalation - Part B Study Progression Dose Selection Process Trigger for SMC Analysis Criteria for Escalation SAD to MAD Cohort 1, based on the SAD cohort demonstrating ~2-fold Treg expansion SAD data observed for Treg expansion (%Treg/CD4+); MAD Cohort 1 dose will be selected from the SAD cohort demonstrating ~2-fold increase in %Treg/CD4+ compared to baseline. ≥ 100% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days in SAD Cohort  SMC determines acceptable safety profile in SAD Cohort (where the dose in SAD Cohort is ≥ the proposed dose for MAD Cohort 1)  SMC approval of dose for MAD Cohort 1 MAD Cohort 1 to MAD Cohort 2 MAD Cohort 2 dose will be selected from the SAD cohort demonstrating ~5-fold increase in %Treg/CD4+ compared to baseline. ≥ 50% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days following the last dose in MAD Cohort 1  SMC determines acceptable safety profile in SAD study at ≥ the proposed dose, and safety and tolerability in MAD Cohort 1  SMC approval of dose for MAD Cohort 2 MAD Cohort 2 to MAD Cohort 3 Dose will be determined from an evaluation of MAD Cohorts 1 and 2. For example, Cohort 3 may test variations in dose and/or frequency, for which safety has been established in the preceding SAD or MAD cohorts. ≥ 50% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days following the last dose in MAD Cohort 2  SMC data review for MAD Cohorts 1 and 2 reports no safety or tolerability concerns  PD results from MAD Cohorts 1 and 2 suggest that further study or additional participants are needed The total duration of the clinical study for each participant in Part B (MAD) will be up to approximately 99 days, including the following:  A screening visit up to 28 days before the first dose (Days −28 to −1)  A treatment period of 8 weeks, with dosing once every 2 weeks (Days 1, 15, 29, and 43) (Note: The dosing frequency for MAD Cohort 3 may be different.)  A total period up to 71 days, with follow-up visits on Days 2, 3 (± 1 day), 4 (± 1 day), 6, 9 (± 1 day), 15 (± 1 day), 20, 29 (± 3 days), 34, 43 (± 3 days), 44, 45, 46, 48, 51 (± 3 days), and 58 (± 3 days)  A final follow-up visit on Day 71 (± 3 days). 4.2. Scientific Rationale for Study Design The nonclinical pharmacology, PK, and toxicology profiles of VIS171 have been adequately characterized and support the evaluation of VIS171 in this FIH study, as detailed in the IB. The SAD design of Part A is considered appropriate to assess the safety, tolerability, PD, and PK of VIS171. Initial dosing in at least Cohorts 1, 2, and 3 (Part A) will be limited to 3 participants who will serve as ‘sentinel participants’. Escalation to the next dosing level  cohort within Part A of the study will only occur after review of safety and PD data by the SMC. Part B of this study incorporates a basket design in that VIS171 will be evaluated in 4 autoimmune diseases that have a common underlying mechanism contributing to disease pathogenesis. A basket design was selected to help prioritize indications for further study, and leverages the Treg PD biomarker that is shared across these indications. The initiation of Cohort 1 (Part B) will be contingent on demonstration of safety profiles deemed acceptable by the SMC in Part A, and initiation of Cohorts 2 and 3 (Part B) will only occur following review of the prior Part B cohort’s safety and PD data by the SMC. The planned safety assessments are conventional, accepted measures for assessing the safety of participants during a clinical study. The PK and PD sampling schedule is based on the nonclinical PK and PD, as well as published information on T cell biology 4.3. Justification for Dose VIS171 will be administered at a first-in-human starting dose of 1 µg/kg SC to healthy participants in Cohort 1 of Part A. The starting dose was selected upon consideration of the VIS171 target and mechanism of action, in vitro activity data, in vitro/in vivo toxicology data, the NOAEL observed in the pivotal toxicology study, and estimations derived from a PK/PD model of the minimally active biological effect level (MABEL) dose in humans. The cynomolgus monkey is considered a relevant species for evaluation of VIS171 toxicity and dose translation due to similar binding affinity of VIS171 to the cynomolgus monkey and human CD25 receptor. The effects of multiple doses of VIS171 were evaluated in a GLP toxicology study in healthy cynomolgus monkeys at 100, 300, and 1000 µg/kg SC once weekly for 8 weeks. There were no VIS171-related adverse findings up to 300 µg/kg; the NOAEL from this study was 300 µg/kg. The anticipated MABEL in human was evaluated using a translational PK/PD model of cynomolgus monkey VIS171 PK and resulting drug effect (expansion of Tregs, reported as a percentage of CD4+ cells, %Treg/CD4+) scaled based upon allometric principles to humans. A single SC dose of 1 µg/kg is predicted to result in a maximum %Treg/CD4+ of 9.6%, which is approximately 2-fold greater than the baseline value of 4.7%, identified as the in vivo MABEL. This further aligns with the in vitro MABEL, identified as the EC25 of 2.8 ng/ml, in an IL-2 signaling assay (in vitro pSTAT5 assay) in human Treg. VIS171 serum concentrations for a single SC dose of 1 µg/kg are not predicted to exceed the  in vitro pSTAT5 assay half maximal effective concentration (EC50; 0.1 nM = 8.4 ng/ml). The maximum (peak) plasma drug concentration (Cmax) at the 1 µg/kg dose is predicted to be 2.9 ng/ml which is in line with the in vitro EC25 (2.8 ng/ml), and the predicted time at EC25 is less than 1 day. As the MABEL was defined based on the EC25, a dose of 1 µg/kg is not expected to exceed the EC50, and the Cmax is expected to be transiently at the EC25. Therefore, based on the simulated human concentrations, in vitro pharmacology assay, and the impact on predicted %Treg/CD4+, 1 µg/kg was identified as the MABEL, and the starting dose for the SAD. The planned dose levels of 4, 8, 16, and 32 μg/kg for Cohorts 2, 3, 4, and 5, respectively, in Part A were also selected from the PK/PD model. The dose increase between any 2 sequential cohorts will not exceed 4-fold, and the maximum dose will not exceed 100 μg/kg. Dose escalation and dose levels will be evaluated by the SMC (as described in Section 4.1.1 [Part A] and Section 4.1.2 [Part B]). For additional details on the dose determination and safety margins, please refer to the VIS171 IB. 4.4. End of Study Definition The end of the study is defined as the date of the last visit of the last participant in the study. A participant is considered to have completed the study if he/she has completed all visits of the intervention and follow-up period.  5. Study Population The study population will consist of approximately 40 healthy participants (Part A) and approximately 36 participants with an autoimmune disease (SLE, AIH, FSGS, or AA) (Part B). Thus, approximately 76 participants will be enrolled. During the study, additional participants may be included. The addition of participants would be subject to SMC review. Participants must be able to provide written informed consent and meet all of the inclusion criteria and none of the exclusion criteria. Prospective approval of protocol deviations to recruitment and enrollment criteria, also known as protocol waivers or exemptions, is not permitted. 5.1. Inclusion Criteria Participants are eligible to be included in the study only if all of the following criteria apply: Inclusion criteria for both Part A and Part B 1. Male or female participant between 18 and 55 years of age, inclusive, at the screening visit (Part A and Part B [participants with AIH, FSGS, and AA]) or between 18 and 75 years of age, inclusive, at the screening visit (Part B [participants with SLE]). 2. Body mass index between 17 and 35 kg/m2, inclusive, at the screening visit. 3. Capable of giving signed informed consent, which includes compliance with the requirements and restrictions listed in the informed consent form (ICF) and in this protocol. 4. Willing and able to participate in the study for the defined duration of the study. 5. Female participants will be nonpregnant, nonlactating, and either postmenopausal for at least 2 years or surgically sterile for at least 3 months, or will agree to use highly effective methods of contraception from the period prior to study enrollment until 30 days following the last dose of study intervention; women of childbearing potential (WOCBP) must have a negative serum beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (β-hCG) test at screening and a negative urine pregnancy test at baseline prior to administration of the study intervention. 6. Male participants with female partners of childbearing potential must agree to use double barrier contraception or abstain from sex during the study and until 90 days following the last dose of study intervention. Male participants must agree to refrain from sperm donation for the duration of the study and 90 days following the last dose of study intervention. This criterion may be waived for male participants who have had a vasectomy greater than 6 months prior to enrollment.  Additional inclusion criterion for Part A 7. Healthy, as determined by prestudy medical evaluation (medical history, physical examination, vital signs, 12-lead ECG, and clinical laboratory evaluations), as judged by the principal investigator. Additional inclusion criteria for Part B (participants with SLE only) 8. Diagnosis of adult SLE according to the 2019 American College of Rheumatology (ACR) classification criteria for at least 6 months prior to signing the ICF. 9. Estimated glomerular filtration rate (eGFR) ≥ 30 mL/min/1.73 m2 (calculated using the Chronic Kidney Disease Epidemiology Collaboration [CKD-EPI] formula [2021]). Additional inclusion criteria for Part B (participants with AIH only) 10. Adults meeting criteria for autoimmune hepatitis (simplified diagnostic criteria [SDC]):  Established by liver biopsy findings, auto-antibody titers, and serum immunoglobulin levels. 11. Participant must have completed induction therapy with standard of care (eg, steroids) and must be on maintenance therapy (eg, azathioprine and/or low dose steroids). Additional inclusion criteria for Part B (participants with FSGS only) 12. History of biopsy-proven FSGS or minimal change disease. 13. History of at least one prior episode of nephrotic syndrome, defined as 24-hour urine protein > 3.5 g/day and serum albumin < 3.0 g/dL. 14. History of at least one prior episode of partial or complete remission in response to corticosteroid therapy. Complete remission is defined as a reduction of proteinuria to < 0.3 g/d or < 300 mg/g (< 30 mg/mmol), normal serum creatinine, and serum albumin > 3.5 g/dL (35 g/L); partial remission is defined as a reduction of proteinuria to 0.3 - 3.5 g/d (300 - 3500 mg/g [30 - 350 mg/mmol]) and stable serum creatinine (increase in serum creatinine < 25%). 15. Estimated glomerular filtration rate ≥ 30 mL/min/1.73 m2. 16. At screening, 24-hour urine protein ≥ 1 g/day or uPCR > 0.75 g/g. Additional inclusion criteria for Part B (participants with AA only) 17. Severity of Alopecia Tool score between 25 and 95 at screening. 18. Current episode of AA is > 24 weeks (without evidence of spontaneous terminal hair regrowth at the time of screening and first treatment, ie, no more than 10% regrowth), but ≤ 5 years (from onset of current episode of severe scalp hair loss).  5.2. Exclusion Criteria Participants are excluded from the study if any of the following criteria apply: Exclusion criteria for both Part A and Part B Prior and Concomitant Therapy 1. Receipt of high dose corticosteroid therapy within 4 weeks prior to screening as either (a) intravenous (IV) pulse corticosteroid therapy or (b) daily oral corticosteroid therapy of ≥ 1 mg/kg or 80 mg/day prednisone (or equivalent). 2. Receipt of belimumab within 6 months prior to screening. 3. History of treatment with rituximab or ocrelizumab (or other B cell-depleting agent) within 12 months prior to screening. 4. History of cytotoxic medications (eg, cyclophosphamide) within the preceding 12 months. 5. Receipt of blood products within 6 months prior to screening. Prior/Concurrent Clinical Study Experience 6. Receipt of any investigational product (small molecule or biologic agent) within 4 weeks or 5 half-lives of the respective product prior to signing of the ICF, whichever is greater. 7. Currently participating in another clinical study of any investigational drug, device, or intervention. Diagnostic Assessments 8. Participants with uncontrolled hypertension (systolic blood pressure [SBP] > 140 mmHg, diastolic blood pressure [DBP] > 90 mmHg in any position) or symptomatic hypotension. 9. Any chronic infectious disease (eg, chronic urinary tract infection; chronic sinusitis; bronchiectasis; active pulmonary or systemic tuberculosis [TB]; chronic viral hepatitis, such as hepatitis C or hepatitis B; or human immunodeficiency virus [HIV] infection). Participants in countries with high prevalence of TB may undergo appropriate investigations (eg, chest X-ray or interferon gamma-release assay), as deemed appropriate by the investigator, to rule out TB. 10. Participant with a positive urine drug or alcohol breath screen test result at screening or Day −1. The urine drug screen and alcohol breath screen may be repeated once at the discretion of the investigator. The urine drug screen also screens for cannabinoids, methylenedioxymethamphetamine, and propoxyphene. If a participant tests positive on these tests, inclusion of that participant into the study will be based on the principal investigator’s judgment with consultation, as needed, with the medical monitor and the sponsor.  Other Exclusions 11. Any participant who has a history of alcohol or drug/chemical abuse, at the discretion of the investigator, will be excluded. 12. Participant who has donated > 500 mL of blood within 60 days prior to the start of screening. 13. Participant who has donated any plasma within 7 days prior to baseline (Day −1). 14. Is an employee of the clinical research team (any sponsor or study site employee), or has a family member who is an employee of these organizations. 15. Participant is judged by the principal investigator or the medical monitor to be inappropriate for the study. 16. History of opportunistic infection requiring hospitalization or intravenous (IV) antimicrobial treatment within 1 year prior to randomization. 17. History of major surgery within 12 weeks of screening or will require major surgery during the study. 18. Clinically significant electrocardiographic abnormalities, as per investigator judgment, at screening. 19. A QT interval corrected for heart rate using Fridericia’s correction (QTcF) > 450 msec for male participants or > 470 msec for female participants at screening (may be repeated once). 20. Participant has received an organ transplant (ie, solid or a bone marrow or hematologic stem cell transplantation). 21. History of any significant cardiovascular disease (eg, myocardial infarction, congestive heart failure, uncontrolled hypertension, cerebrovascular accident) or thrombotic episode. 22. History of cancer, apart from:  Squamous or basal cell carcinoma of the skin that has been successfully treated.  Cervical cancer in situ that has been successfully treated. 23. COVID-19:  Current symptoms of infection.  Diagnosis of COVID-19 (reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction [RT-PCR], antigen testing, or clinical diagnosis) in the 21 days prior to screening.  Ongoing diagnosis of “Long-COVID” symptoms, due to a prior COVID-19 infection. 24. Received a vaccination, other than COVID-19 vaccination, during the 30 days prior to administration of the first dose of study intervention. A COVID-19 vaccination cannot be received within 7 days prior to the first dose of study intervention and until 14 days after the last dose.  Additional exclusion criteria for Part A Medical Conditions 25. Participant has a history or current evidence of a serious and/or unstable cardiovascular, respiratory, gastrointestinal, hematologic, autoimmune, blood dyscrasias or other medical disorder, including psychiatric disorders, cirrhosis, or malignancy. History of minor skin cancers (not including melanoma) or surgically treated, limited cervical carcinomas (ie, carcinoma in situ) are not exclusionary. 26. Participant has a history or presence of proteinuria, chronic kidney disease, disease requiring immunosuppressive therapy (including systemic steroids), or is considered to be immunosuppressed for any other reason. 27. History of a previous severe allergic reaction with generalized urticaria; angioedema or anaphylaxis. 28. Known immunodeficiency disorder. 29. History of chronic infection (eg, tuberculosis, osteomyelitis) or any infection requiring hospitalization or treatment with antivirals, antibiotics, or antifungal therapy within 30 days prior to administration of the study intervention. 30. Alanine transaminase (ALT) or aspartate transaminase (AST) > 1.5 × the upper limit of normal (ULN) at screening. 31. Total bilirubin > 1.5 × ULN (isolated bilirubin > 1.5 × ULN is acceptable if total bilirubin is fractionated and direct bilirubin < 35%) at screening. 32. Known hepatic (ie, chronic hepatitis C or hepatitis B infection, nonalcoholic steatohepatitis, or cirrhosis) or biliary abnormalities (Gilberts syndrome or asymptomatic gallstones are permitted exceptions). Additional exclusion criterion for Part A and Part B (participants with AIH and AA) 33. At screening, uACR from first morning voided specimen > 30 mg/g. Additional exclusion criterion for Part B (participants with SLE, AIH, and FSGS) 34. Participants with change in dose of oral steroids in the 14 days prior to screening. Additional exclusion criteria for Part B (participants with SLE only) 35. Presence of life- or organ-threatening manifestations of lupus requiring intense immunosuppressive therapy, organ support systems, or plasmapheresis. 36. Lupus cerebritis, or active severe or unstable neuropsychiatric SLE. Additional exclusion criterion for Part B (participants with AIH only) 37. Advanced cirrhosis/liver disease:  Child-Pugh B or C.  Refractory/resistant AIH: requiring second-line agents (eg, rituximab, mycophenolate mofetil) to induce remission.   Overlap syndrome: primary biliary cirrhosis, inflammatory bowel disease, primary sclerosing cholangitis, etc. Additional exclusion criteria for Part B (participants with FSGS only) 38. Steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome defined as absence of complete or partial remission following at least 12 weeks of full dose corticosteroid therapy. 39. Known secondary causes of FSGS (eg, genetic/familial, viral, reflux uropathy, toxic causes [eg, bisphosphonates]). Additional exclusion criteria for Part B (participants with AA only) 40. Participant has concomitant hair loss of another form, including but not limited to traction alopecia, central centrifugal cicatricial alopecia, lichen planopilaris, frontal fibrosing alopecia, or androgenetic alopecia. 41. Presence of other severe autoimmune diseases – requiring additional immunosuppressive treatment. 42. Participant has received (1) Systemic therapies (oral or injection), such as corticosteroids, janus kinase inhibitors, methotrexate, calcineurin inhibitors, oral minoxidil, low-dose IL-2 and topical immunotherapies such as psoralen plus UV- A (PUVA), diphenylcyclopropenone (DPCP), dinitrochlorobenzene (DNCB), intralesional steroids for 12 weeks (2) Other topical therapies, such as topical minoxidil, clobetasol etc for 4 weeks. These therapies will also not be allowed during this study. 5.3. Lifestyle Considerations 5.3.1. Meals and Dietary Restrictions There are no meal or dietary restrictions for Parts A and B. 5.3.2. Caffeine, Alcohol, and Tobacco 5.3.2.1. Caffeine There are no restrictions on caffeine for Parts A and B. 5.3.2.2. Alcohol For the duration of the study (Parts A and B), male participants should not consume more than 15 standard alcohol drinks per week (7 days) and female participants should not consume more than 10 standard alcohol drinks per week (7 days). A standard drink equals 10 g of alcohol. In addition for Part A, enrolled participants must abstain from consuming alcohol 24 hours prior to check-in to the study site on Day −1 through discharge.  5.3.2.3. Tobacco For Part A, enrolled participants must abstain from consumption of nicotine-containing products while admitted to the study site (Day−1 through discharge). There are no restrictions on tobacco for Part B. 5.3.3. Activity There are no restrictions on activity for Parts A and B. 5.3.4. Other For Parts A and B, blood donation (> 500 mL) is prohibited within 60 days prior to start of screening and/or donation of any plasma within 7 days prior to baseline (Day −1). Blood and plasma donation is also prohibited for the duration of the study and for 30 days after the last dose of study intervention. 5.4. Screen Failures Screen failures are defined as participants who consent to participate in the clinical study but are not subsequently randomly assigned to study intervention (Part A) or entered in the study (Part B). A minimal set of screen failure information is required to ensure transparent reporting of screen failure participants to meet the Consolidated Standards of Reporting Trials (CONSORT) publishing requirements and to respond to queries from regulatory authorities. Minimal information includes demography, screen failure details, eligibility criteria, and any SAE. Individuals who do not meet the criteria for participation in this study (screen failure) may be rescreened once. Rescreened participants should be assigned a new participant number for every screening/rescreening event. 5.5. Criteria for Temporarily Delaying Administration of Study Intervention Not applicable.  6. Study Intervention(s) and Concomitant Therapy Study intervention is defined as any investigational intervention(s), marketed product(s), placebo, or medical device(s) intended to be administered to a study participant according to the study protocol. 6.1. Study Intervention Administered Study intervention will be administered as a μg/kg dosage determined by the dose assigned at the time of randomization (Part A) or enrollment (Part B). The dose of study intervention will be based on the Day 1 predose weight. The intended dose study intervention will be administered as a SC injection. 6.1.1. Part A Participants in each cohort will receive a single SC dose of VIS171 or placebo on Day 1. The starting dose for VIS171 is 1 μg/kg. Dose decisions will be evaluated based on safety and PD data as described in Section 4.1.1. The study interventions that will be administered are summarized in Table 6.1.1-1. Table 6.1.1-1 Identity of Study Interventions - Part A Intervention Name VIS171 Placebo Type Drug Drug Dose Formulation Solution Solution Unit Dose Strength 5 mg/mL N/A Dosage Level Estimated doses of 1, 4, 8, 16, and 32 μg/kg and not more than 100 μg/kg. N/A Route of Administration SC SC Injection Site Abdomen Abdomen Use Experimental Placebo-comparator IMP and NIMP IMP IMP Sourcing Provided centrally by the sponsor Provided centrally by the sponsor Packaging and Labeling The study intervention will be provided as vials and labeled according to applicable local and regulatory requirements. IMP = investigational medicinal product; NIMP = noninvestigational medicinal product; N/A = not applicable. 6.1.2. Part B The dosing frequency in Cohorts 1 and 2 will be once every 2 weeks for 8 weeks (total of 4 doses). The doses for Cohorts 1 and 2 will be derived from Part A, as described in Section 4.1.2. The dosing frequency for Cohort 3 will be determined from Cohorts 1 and 2, and may be increased to once every week for 8 weeks (up to 8 doses).  The study intervention that will be administered is summarized in Table 6.1.2-1. Table 6.1.2-1 Identity of Study Interventions - Part B Intervention Name VIS171 Type Drug Dose Formulation Solution Unit Dose Strength 5 mg/mL Dosage Level To be determined Route of Administration SC Injection Site Abdomen Use Experimental IMP and NIMP IMP Sourcing Sponsor Packaging and Labeling The study intervention will be provided as vials and labeled according to applicable local and regulatory requirements. 6.2. Preparation, Handling, Storage, and Accountability The investigator or designee must confirm appropriate temperature conditions have been maintained during transit for all study intervention received and any discrepancies are reported and resolved before use of the study intervention. Only participants enrolled in the study may receive study intervention and only authorized site staff may supply or administer study intervention. All study intervention must be stored in a secure, environmentally controlled, and monitored (manual or automated) area in accordance with the labeled storage conditions with access limited to the investigator and authorized site staff. The study intervention will be supplied in vials. The study pharmacist (or designee) will dispense study intervention for each participant according to the protocol and pharmacy manual. Prior to administration, the study intervention should be placed at room temperature to allow for temperature equilibration. For further details on drug preparation and administration, please refer to the pharmacy manual. The investigator, institution, or the head of the medical institution (where applicable) is responsible for study intervention accountability, reconciliation, and record maintenance (ie, receipt, reconciliation, and final disposition records). All dispensing and accountability records will be available for sponsor review. When the study monitor visits the study site, he/she will reconcile the drug accountability log with the products stored in the pharmacy.  Further guidance and information for the final disposition of unused study interventions are provided in the pharmacy manual. 6.3. Measures to Minimize Bias: Randomization and Blinding 6.3.1. Part A Part A is double-blinded. An unblinded pharmacist (or other unblinded designee) will prepare the study intervention doses for SC administration. Participants, investigators, the sponsor, and all other site staff will be blinded to the study intervention. All eligible participants will be centrally assigned to randomized study intervention using an Interactive Voice Response System/Interactive Web Response System (IVRS/IWRS). Before the study is initiated, the telephone number and call-in directions for the IVRS and/or the log-in information and directions for the IWRS will be provided to each study site. Participants will be randomly assigned to receive VIS171 or placebo in each cohort (6 VIS171 and 2 placebo) with the first 3 participants randomized as a block of 3 (2 VIS171 and 1 placebo). Each assignment will have a unique randomization number, assigned to eligible participants after the screening. Once a randomization number has been assigned via the IVRS/IWRS, it may not be reassigned. In case of an emergency, the investigator has the sole responsibility for determining if unblinding of a participants’ intervention assignment is warranted. Participant safety must always be the first consideration in making such a determination. If the investigator decides that unblinding is required for participant safety, the investigator should make every effort to contact the sponsor prior to unblinding a participant’s intervention assignment unless this could delay emergency treatment of the participant. If a participant’s intervention assignment is unblinded, the sponsor must be notified within 24 hours after breaking the blind. The date and reason that the blind was broken must be recorded in the source documentation and electronic case report form (eCRF), as applicable. Clinical laboratory tests that could unblind investigators, the sponsor, or study site staff will not be performed at the local laboratories. 6.3.2. Part B Not applicable, as Part B is open-label.  6.4. Study Intervention Compliance Preparation of individual doses of study intervention will be verified by a second (unblinded) member of the study site pharmacy staff. When participants are dosed at the site, they will receive study intervention directly from the investigator or designee, under medical supervision. The date and time of each dose administered in the clinic will be recorded in the source documents and recorded. The dose of study intervention and study participant identification will be confirmed at the time of dosing by a member of the study site staff other than the person administering the study intervention. 6.5. Dose Modification The decision of the dose level of VIS171 (either a decrease, increase, or repeat of the previous dose) for the subsequent cohort(s) after Cohort 1 (Part A) will be made by the SMC for Part A (Section 4.1.1) and Part B (Section 4.1.2). 6.6. Continued Access to Study Intervention after the End of the Study Not applicable; there will be no access to the study intervention following the end of the study. 6.7. Treatment of Overdose Standard symptomatic measures should be used in the case of excessive pharmacological effects or overdose. No antidotes are available. In the event of an overdose, the investigators should:  Contact the medical monitor immediately.  Evaluate the participant to determine, in consultation with the medical monitor, whether study intervention should be stopped (Part B).  Closely monitor the participant for any AE or SAE and clinical laboratory abnormalities until the last visit or until the AE or SAE has resolved.  Document the quantity of the excess dose as well as the duration of the overdose. 6.8. Concomitant Therapy Any medication or vaccine (including over-the-counter and prescription medicines, vitamins, herbal supplements, fish oil, and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs [NSAIDs]) that the participant is receiving at the time of enrollment or receives during the study must be recorded along with:   The reason for use  Dates of administration including start and end dates  Dosage information including dose and frequency The medical monitor should be contacted if there are any questions regarding concomitant or prior therapy. 6.8.1. Prohibited Medications or Therapies The following medications or therapies are prohibited in Parts A and B:  High dose corticosteroid therapy within 4 weeks prior to screening as either (a) IV pulse corticosteroid therapy or (b) daily oral corticosteroid therapy of ≥ 1 mg/kg or 80 mg/day prednisone (or equivalent) and for the full course of the study.  Belimumab within 6 months prior to screening and for the full course of the study.  Rituximab or ocrelizumab (or other B cell-depleting agent) within 12 months prior to screening and for the full course of the study.  Cytotoxic medications (eg, cyclophosphamide) within 12 months prior to screening and for the full course of the study.  Receipt of blood products within 6 months prior to screening and for the full course of the study. 6.8.1.1. Part A Prior and concomitant medication use is not permitted during the last 30 days preceding baseline (Day −1) until end of study (including over-the-counter and prescription medicines, except for acetaminophen, ibuprofen [or an equivalent NSAID], hormonal contraceptives, topical medications, vitamins, minerals, dietary, or herbal remedies). However, concomitant medication use may be warranted for the treatment of AEs. The use of concomitant medications to treat AEs should be discussed between the investigator and the medical monitor. 6.8.1.2. Part B For participants with AA, the following is prohibited:  (1) Systemic therapies (oral or injection), such as corticosteroids, janus kinase inhibitors, methotrexate, calcineurin inhibitors, oral minoxidil, low-dose IL-2 and topical immunotherapies such as PUVA, DPCP, DNCB, intralesional steroids for 12 weeks (2) Other topical therapies, such as topical minoxidil, clobetasol etc for 4 weeks. These therapies will also not be allowed during this study.  6.8.2. Permitted Medications or Therapies 6.8.2.1. Part A Acetaminophen, ibuprofen (or an equivalent NSAID), hormonal contraceptives, topical medications, vitamins, minerals, dietary, or herbal remedies are permitted during the study. Other concomitant medication use may be considered on a case-by-case basis by the investigator in consultation with the medical monitor. 6.8.2.2. Part B The dose of oral prednisone or prednisone equivalent the participant is taking must be stable for a minimum of 2 weeks prior to screening. Participants with SLE may also take the following immunosuppressive therapy for SLE: hydroxychloroquine, azathioprine, mycophenolate mofetil, and calcineurin inhibitor drugs. Participants with AIH must be on maintenance therapy for AIH (eg, azathioprine and/or low dose steroids). Second- and third-line drugs such as calcineurin inhibitor drugs, mycophenolate mofetil, and rituximab are not permitted. Medications to treat unrelated conditions are allowed at the discretion of the investigator and in consultation with the medical monitor, so long as the medication does not fit the class of a prohibited medication. 6.8.3. Rescue Medicine Not applicable.  7. Discontinuation of Study Intervention and Participant Discontinuation/Withdrawal 7.1. Stopping Criteria for Dose Escalation Dose escalation will be stopped if the dose for a cohort is determined not to be safe or well tolerated. For example, dose escalation will be reviewed and may be stopped if possibly, probably, or definitely related AE(s) in participants who received study intervention meet any of the following criteria:  One or more SAEs  Clinically significant, as defined by the site investigator, laboratory abnormalities of the same characteristics in 2 or more participants.  For Part A, this will be a Grade ≥ 3 toxicity with associated clinical signs and symptoms.  For Part B, due to normal disease progression, clinical laboratory stopping criteria should be evaluated in the context of the disease and have a different threshold for evaluation: Clinical laboratory stopping criteria (Part B only):  ALT ≥ 3 change from baseline  AST ≥ 3 change from baseline  Serum creatinine > 1.5 change from baseline  A decrease from baseline in hemoglobin concentration > 3 g/dL  White blood cell count < 1500/mm3  Platelets < 50000/mm3  Severe AEs of the same characteristics in 2 or more participants or of a different characteristic in 3 or more participants.  Based on first morning voided urine samples, the development of new onset nonorthostatic albuminuria defined as a shift from the category of normal albuminuria (uACR < 30 mg/g) to either moderately increased albuminuria (uACR ≥ 30 mg/g to ≤ 300 mg/g), or severely increased albuminuria (uACR > 300 mg/g); or from moderately to severely increased albuminuria (uACR > 300 mg/g). Dose escalation will be held pending review by the SMC (Part A only). Depending upon the nature of the event, a decision may be made by the SMC to resume dosing, to proceed into the next cohort at a lower dose level, or to stop the study.  7.2. Participant Discontinuation/Withdrawal from the Study A participant may withdraw from the study at any time at his/her own request or may be withdrawn at any time at the discretion of the investigator for safety, behavioral, or compliance reasons. This is expected to be uncommon. Every effort will be made to determine why any participant withdraws from the study prematurely. All participants who withdraw from the study with an ongoing AE must be followed until the event is resolved or deemed stable. If the participant withdraws consent for disclosure of future information, the sponsor may retain and continue to use any data collected before such a withdrawal of consent. If a participant withdraws from the study, he/she may request destruction of any samples taken and not tested, and the investigator must document this in the study site records. Participants have the right to withdraw from the study at any time for any reason. Participants may withdraw or be withdrawn from study for the following reasons:  Withdrawal of consent  Adverse event  Protocol deviation  Investigator decision  Pregnancy  Loss to follow-up  Sponsor decision to terminate the study  Other Participants can be replaced at the discretion of the sponsor. The same treatment will be allocated to the replacement participant. 7.3. Lost to Follow-up A participant will be considered lost to follow-up if he or she repeatedly fails to return for scheduled visits and is unable to be contacted by the study site. The following actions must be taken if a participant fails to return to the clinic for a required study visit:  The site must attempt to contact the participant and reschedule the missed visit as soon as possible and counsel the participant on the importance of maintaining the assigned visit schedule and ascertain whether or not the participant wishes to and/or should continue in the study.   Before a participant is deemed lost to follow-up, the investigator or designee must make every effort to regain contact with the participant (where possible, 3 telephone calls and, if necessary, a certified letter to the participant’s last known mailing address or local equivalent methods). These contact attempts should be documented in the participant’s medical record.  Should the participant continue to be unreachable, he/she will be considered to have withdrawn from the study. Discontinuation of a study or of the study as a whole are handled as part of Section 10.1.8.  8. Study Assessments and Procedures Study procedures and their timing are summarized in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Protocol waivers or exemptions are not allowed. Immediate safety concerns should be discussed with the sponsor immediately upon occurrence or awareness to determine if the participant should continue or discontinue study intervention. Adherence to the study design requirements, including those specified in the Schedules of Assessments, is essential and required for study conduct. All screening evaluations must be completed and reviewed to confirm that potential participants meet all eligibility criteria. The investigators will maintain screening logs to record details of all participants screened and to confirm eligibility or record reasons for screening failure, as applicable. Procedures conducted as part of the participant’s routine clinical management (eg, blood count) and obtained before signing of the ICF may be utilized for screening or baseline purposes provided the procedures met the protocol-specified criteria and were performed within the time-frame defined in the Schedules of Assessments. The maximum amount of blood collected from each participant over the duration of the study, including any extra assessments that may be required, will not exceed 450 mL. Repeat or unscheduled samples may be taken for safety reasons or for technical issues with the samples. 8.1. Efficacy Assessments To assess clinical response trends, the following other assessments will be performed during Part B. 8.1.1. Safety of Estrogens in Lupus Erythematosus-Systemic Lupus Erythematosus Disease Activity Index The Safety of Estrogens in Lupus Erythematosus: National Assessment-Systemic Lupus Erythematosus Disease Activity Index (SELENA-SLEDAI) will be performed at the time points described in the Schedule of Assessments for participants with SLE (Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE]).  The SELENA-SLEDAI is a well-established, validated instrument to assess disease activity in patients with SLE. The SELENA-SLEDAI incorporates the signs and symptoms of disease activity in 9 organ systems with 24 descriptors. The 9 organ systems include the central nervous, vascular, renal, musculoskeletal, serosal, dermal, immunologic, constitutional and hematologic systems. The 24 descriptors include various manifestations of the disease, such as seizure, headache, arthritis, new rash, mucosal ulcers, and laboratory findings. Each descriptor has a specific definition and is rated as present or absent over the 10 days before and including the day of evaluation. All of the descriptors are weighted to yield a composite score ranging from 0 to 105, with higher scores indicating more severe disease. 8.1.2. Laboratory Assessments 8.1.2.1. Urine Protein/Creatinine Ratio Twenty-four-hour urine collection for derivation of 24-hour urine volume, protein, creatinine, and urine protein/creatinine ratio (uPCR) will be collected for participants with FSGS at the time points outlined in in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS]). The 24-hour urine collection should start after the first void upon awakening and every complete urine void is to be collected for a 24-hour period. Participants will be advised on how to perform this collection by qualified clinical study personnel. Urine spot specimens will be collected to assess uPCR for participants with SLE and FSGS at the time points described in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE] and Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS]). 8.1.2.2. Urine Albumin/Creatinine Ratio Urine spot specimens will be collected to assess uACR for participants with SLE at the time points described in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE]). 8.1.2.3. Estimated Glomerular Filtration Rate Estimated glomerular filtration rate will be determined, using the CKD-EPI formula (2021), from the blood samples collected for clinical chemistry (Section 8.2.4). 8.1.2.4. Other Blood samples for double-stranded deoxyribonucleic acid (ds-DNA) and markers of complement activity will be collected at the time points described in the Schedule of Assessments for participants with SLE (Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE]).  Blood samples for serum IgG will be collected at the time points described in the Schedule of Assessments for participants with AIH (Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH]). 8.1.3. Severity of Alopecia Tool The Severity of Alopecia Tool (SALT) will be performed at the time points described in the Schedule of Assessments for participants with AA (Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). The SALT score is a physician administered scale measuring the amount of scalp without any terminal hair assessed by the investigator. Possible scores range from 0 (no scalp hair loss) to 100 (complete scalp hair loss). A negative change in the SALT score over time represents hair regrowth by adding the percentage hair loss in the various areas (ie, top, back, each side) of the scalp. 8.1.4. Scalp Biopsy An optional scalp biopsy may be performed for participants with AA at the time points summarized in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Exploratory biomarker assessments of scalp tissue may provide additional insights into the local cellular response to VIS171 in AA participants. A local dermatologist will obtain the scalp biopsy for histopathological examination. 8.1.5. Clinician Reported Outcomes for Eyelashes and Eyebrows An assessment of eyebrows and eyelashes will be performed using Clinician Reported Outcomes for eyelashes and eyebrows (ClinRO) for participants with AA at the time points summarized in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). 8.1.6. Standardized Photography Standardized photography will be performed for participants with AA at the time points summarized in the Schedule of Assessments (Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). 8.2. Safety Assessments 8.2.1. Physical Examinations Physical examinations will be performed at the time points summarized in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). A full physical examination will include, at a minimum, assessment of general appearance and an evaluation of skin, head, eyes (excluding fundoscopic examination of  retinae), ears, nose and throat, chest and abdomen (excluding rectal examination), extremities, and musculoskeletal system. A brief physical examination will include, at a minimum, assessment of the general appearance, skin, cardiovascular system, respiratory system, and abdomen. 8.2.2. Vital Signs Vital sign assessments will be performed at the time points summarized in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 1.3-1 [Part A], Table 1.3-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 1.3-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 1.3-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 1.3-5 [Part B - AA]). Vital signs including blood pressure, heart rate, respiratory rate, and temperature will be assessed. Height (at screening only) and weight will also be measured. Blood pressure and pulse measurements will be assessed while the participant is seated or supine with a completely automated device. Manual techniques will be used only if an automated device is not available. Blood pressure and pulse measurements should be preceded by at least 5 minutes of rest for the participant in a quiet setting without distractions (no television, cell phone, etc). Whenever possible, vital signs should be collected before blood collection for laboratory tests and before dosing with study intervention. 8.2.3. Electrocardiograms Single 12-lead ECGs will be obtained as outlined in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]) using an ECG machine that automatically calculates the heart rate and measures PR, QRS, QT, and QTcF intervals. Twelve-lead ECGs should be conducted after 5 minutes in recumbence or semi- recumbency. 8.2.4. Clinical Safety Laboratory Assessments See Section 10.2 for the list of clinical laboratory tests (hematology, serum chemistry, coagulation, and urinalysis) to be performed and the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]) for the timing and frequency.  Urine spot specimens will be collected to assess uACR for Part A and Part B (participants with AIH and AA) at the time points described in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Urine spot specimens will also be collected to assess uPCR for Part A at the time points described in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A]). An investigator must review the laboratory report, document this review, and record any clinically significant changes occurring during the study as an AE. The laboratory reports must be filed with the source documents. Abnormal laboratory findings associated with the underlying disease are not considered clinically significant unless judged by an investigator to be more severe than expected for the participant's condition. All laboratory tests with values considered clinically significantly abnormal during participation in the study should be repeated until the values return to normal or baseline or are no longer considered clinically significant by an investigator or medical monitor. If clinically significant values do not return to normal/baseline within a period of time judged reasonable by the investigator, the etiology should be identified, and the sponsor notified. All protocol-required laboratory tests, as defined in Section 10.2, must be conducted in accordance with the laboratory manual. If laboratory values from non-protocol-specified laboratory tests performed at the institution’s local laboratory require a change in participant management or are considered clinically significant by the investigator (eg, SAE or AE or dose modification), then the results must be recorded. 8.2.4.1. Pregnancy Testing Pregnancy tests will be performed at the time points summarized in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 1.3-1 [Part A], Table 1.3-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 1.3-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 1.3-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 1.3-5 [Part B - AA]). Additional serum or urine pregnancy tests may be performed, as determined necessary by the investigator or required by local regulation, to establish the absence of pregnancy at any time during the participant’s participation in the study.  8.2.4.2. Other Serology testing (see Section 10.2) will be performed at screening for Part A and Part B (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Drug (see Section 10.2) and alcohol screening will be performed at screening for Part A (Table 2.1-1 [Part A]). 8.2.5. Assessment of Injection Site Poor local tolerability is defined as an injection site reaction deemed abnormal from those ordinarily observed for subcutaneous injections (including a large erythematous reaction, induration, significant pain, itching, or swelling). The injection site should be observed and evaluated by the blinded (as applicable) investigator or trained, qualified designee. If a reaction is observed, it will be graded on a 4-point categorical scale (Mild, Moderate, Severe, Potentially Life-threatening) for the presence or absence of any of the clinical features described per the scale in Section 10.5 (Appendix 5). Whenever possible, the same individual should perform all assessments of the injection site for any participant. 8.3. Adverse Events, Serious Adverse Events, and Other Safety Reporting The definitions of AEs, SAEs, and immediately reportable events (IREs) can be found in Section 10.3. Adverse events will be reported by the participant (or, when appropriate, by a caregiver, surrogate, or the participant's legally authorized representative). The investigator and any qualified designees are responsible for detecting, documenting, and recording events that meet the definition of an AE or SAE and remain responsible for following up AEs that are serious, considered related to the study intervention or study procedures, or that caused the participant to discontinue the study (see Section 7). The method of recording, evaluating, and assessing causality of AEs and SAEs and the procedures for completing and transmitting IRE reports are provided in Section 10.3. The contact for IRE reporting is provided in Section 10.3.6.  8.3.1. Time Period and Frequency for Collecting AE and SAE Information All AEs and SAEs will be collected from the signing of the ICF until the last visit as specified in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Medical occurrences that begin before the start of study intervention but after obtaining informed consent will be recorded as Medical History/Current Medical Conditions, not as AEs. All SAEs will be recorded and reported to the sponsor or designee immediately and under no circumstance should this exceed 24 hours, as indicated in Section 10.3. The investigator will submit any updated SAE data to the sponsor within 24 hours of it being available. Investigators are not obligated to actively seek information on AEs or SAEs after conclusion of the study participation. However, if the investigator learns of any SAE, including a death, at any time after a participant has been discharged from the study, and he/she considers the event to be reasonably related to the study intervention or study participation, the investigator must promptly notify the sponsor. 8.3.2. Method of Detecting AEs and SAEs Care will be taken not to introduce bias when detecting AEs and/or SAEs. Open-ended and non-leading verbal questioning of the participant is the preferred method to inquire about AE occurrences. 8.3.3. Follow-up of AEs and SAEs After the initial AE or SAE report, the investigator is required to proactively follow each participant at subsequent visits and/or contacts. All SAEs, AEs of special interest (as defined in Section 8.3.7), will be followed until resolution, stabilization, the event is otherwise explained, or the participant is lost to follow-up (as defined in Section 7.3). Further information on follow-up procedures is provided in Section 10.3. 8.3.4. Regulatory Reporting Requirements for SAEs Prompt notification by the investigator to the sponsor of an SAE is essential so that legal obligations and ethical responsibilities towards the safety of participants and the safety of a study intervention under clinical investigation are met.  The sponsor has a legal responsibility to notify both the local regulatory authority and other regulatory agencies about the safety of a study intervention under clinical investigation. The sponsor will comply with country-specific regulatory requirements relating to safety reporting to the regulatory authority, IRB/IEC, and investigators. An investigator who receives an investigator safety report describing an SAE or other specific safety information (eg, summary or listing of SAEs) from the sponsor will review and then file it along with the IB and will notify the IRB/IEC, if appropriate according to local requirements. Investigator safety reports must be prepared for suspected unexpected serious adverse reactions (SUSAR) according to local regulatory requirements and sponsor policy and forwarded to investigators as necessary. 8.3.5. Pregnancy Details of all pregnancies in female participants and female partners of male participants will be collected after the start of study intervention and until 30 days following the last dose of study intervention (female participants) or 90 days following the last dose of study intervention (female partners of male participants). If a pregnancy is reported, the investigator will record pregnancy information on the appropriate form and submit it to the sponsor within 24 hours of learning of the female participant or female partner of male participant (after obtaining the necessary signed informed consent from the female partner) pregnancy. While pregnancy itself is not considered to be an AE or SAE, any pregnancy complication or elective termination of a pregnancy for medical reasons will be reported as an AE or SAE. Abnormal pregnancy outcomes (eg, spontaneous abortion, fetal death, stillbirth, congenital anomalies, ectopic pregnancy) are considered SAEs and will be reported as such. The participant/pregnant female partner will be followed to determine the outcome of the pregnancy. The investigator will collect follow-up information on the participant/pregnant female partner and the neonate and the information will be forwarded to the sponsor. Any poststudy pregnancy-related SAE considered reasonably related to the study intervention by the investigator will be reported to the sponsor as described in Section 8.3.4. While the investigator is not obligated to actively seek this information in  former study participants/pregnant female partners, he or she may learn of an SAE through spontaneous reporting. Any female participant who becomes pregnant while participating in the study will discontinue study intervention and be withdrawn from the study. 8.3.6. Disease-Related Events and/or Disease-Related Outcomes Not Qualifying as AEs or SAEs Natural fluctuations in disease state are anticipated will be periodically assessed by the investigator. Exacerbations or changes in disease progression should be reported as an AE only if there are unusual or severe clinical features that were not present, or experienced earlier, or not expected based on the course of the condition or if there appears to be a change in disease progression. 8.3.7. Adverse Events of Special Interest Not applicable. 8.3.8. Potential Serious Hepatotoxicity For a participant who experiences an elevation in AST or ALT that is ≥ 3 times the upper limit of normal (ULN), a total bilirubin level should also be evaluated. If the total bilirubin is ≥ 2 times the ULN, complete an IRE form with all values listed and also report as an AE in the eCRF. 8.4. Pharmacodynamics To determine the PD effect of VIS171, whole blood samples will be collected for the measurement of lymphocyte populations (Treg, helper T cells, cytotoxic T cells, and natural killer cells) and immune cell types during Part A and Part B at the time points specified in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). To assess the effect of VIS171 on cytokine profiles, whole blood samples will be collected for the measurement of plasma cytokine levels during Part A and Part B at the time points specified in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Cytokines included in the panel will be listed in the laboratory manual.  Instructions for the collection and handling of biological samples will be provided by the sponsor in a separate laboratory manual. The actual date and time (24-hour clock time) of each sample will be recorded. 8.5. Pharmacokinetics Whole blood samples will be collected for measurement of serum concentrations of VIS171 at the time points specified in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Other concomitant medications may be measured and assessed. Instructions for the collection and handling of biological samples will be provided by the sponsor in a separate laboratory manual. The actual date and time (24-hour clock time) of each sample will be recorded. During Part A, intervention concentration information that would unblind the study will not be reported to investigative sites or blinded personnel until the study has been unblinded. 8.6. Genetics and/or Pharmacogenomics Whole blood samples will be collected for peripheral blood mononuclear cell (PBMC) isolation at the time points specified in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]). Peripheral blood mononuclear cells will be isolated from whole blood and frozen for single-cell ribonucleic acid (RNA) sequencing studies. 8.7. Biomarkers Samples will be tested for urine and blood biomarkers of disease state to evaluate their association with the observed clinical response to VIS171. 8.8. Immunogenicity Assessments Anti-drug antibodies (ADAs) will be evaluated in serum samples collected from participants at the time points described in the Schedules of Assessments (Table 2.1-1 [Part A], Table 2.1-2 [Part B - SLE], Table 2.1-3 [Part B - AIH], Table 2.1-4 [Part B - FSGS], and Table 2.1-5 [Part B - AA]).  Serum samples will be screened for antibodies binding to VIS171 and the titer of confirmed positive samples will be reported. Other analyses may be performed to further characterize the immunogenicity of VIS171. Samples may be stored for a maximum of 15 years (or according to local regulations) following the last participant’s last visit for the study at a facility selected by the sponsor to enable further analysis of immune responses to VIS171. 8.9. Medical Resource Utilization and Health Economics Health Economics or Medical Resource Utilization and Health Economics parameters will not be evaluated in this study.  9. Statistical Considerations The statistical analyses will be separated by Part A and Part B. Details will be provided in the statistical analysis plan (SAP). 9.1. Statistical Hypotheses There are no statistical hypotheses to be tested in this study. 9.2. Sample Size Determination In Part A, approximately 40 healthy participants (5 cohorts of 8 participants) will be randomly assigned to study intervention. In Part B, up to 36 participants (3 cohorts of 12 participants) with an autoimmune disease will be enrolled. The number of participants in MAD Cohort 3 is to be determined, but is anticipated to be approximately 12 participants. Thus, approximately 76 participants will be enrolled. During the study, additional participants may be included. The addition of participants would be subject to SMC review. 9.3. Analysis Sets For the purpose of analysis, the following analysis sets are defined: Table 9.3-1 Analysis Sets Analysis Sets Description Safety analysis set All participants who receive a dose of study intervention. Pharmacodynamic analysis set All participants who receive a dose of study intervention and have at least one postdose evaluable PD measure. Pharmacokinetic analysis set All participants who receive a dose of study intervention and have at least one postdose evaluable VIS171 serum concentration. Immunogenicity analysis set All participants who receive a dose of study intervention and have at least one evaluable ADA measure. Indication and subindication specific analyses may be conducted. Details will be provided in the SAP. 9.4. Statistical Analyses The SAP will be finalized prior to database lock and it will include a more technical and detailed description of the statistical analyses described in this section. This section is a summary of the planned statistical analyses of the most important endpoints including primary and secondary endpoints.  9.4.1. General Considerations All data collected will be documented using summary tables, figures, and/or participant data listings presented by intervention, dose group, and or indication (as applicable). Descriptive statistics for continuous variables will be summarized by treatment group and will include the number of participants, arithmetic mean, standard deviation, median, minimum and maximum; descriptive statistics for categorical data will be summarized by treatment group using frequency counts and percentages. Data grouped by cohorts and overall (all cohorts) will be analyzed separately if deemed appropriate, details will be described in the SAP. 9.4.2. Safety Analysis 9.4.2.1. Adverse Events Adverse events will be coded by system organ class and preferred term using the Medical Dictionary for Regulatory Activities (MedDRA). All AEs will be listed. The incidence of the following events will be summarized:  TEAEs  TEAEs by severity  TEAEs potentially causally related to the study intervention  TEAEs with an outcome of death  Serious TEAEs  TEAEs leading to discontinuation of the study intervention  Serious TEAEs leading to discontinuation of the study intervention The categories of the relationship to study intervention will be summarized as related (Related, Probably Related, Possibly Related) and not related (Unlikely to be related and Unrelated). 9.4.2.2. Clinical Laboratory Data Individual data listings of laboratory results will be presented for each participant. Flags will be attached to values outside of the laboratory’s reference limits along with the principal investigator’s assessment. Clinically significant laboratory test abnormalities that were considered AEs by the principal investigator will be presented in the AE listings.  Clinical laboratory tests (observed values) will be summarized using descriptive statistics. Shift tables will be presented for select laboratory parameters. 9.4.2.3. Physical Examination and Vital Signs Data Physical examination data will be provided in a data listing. Individual data listings of vital signs (observed and change from baseline) will be presented for each participant. Individual clinically significant vital signs findings that were considered AEs by the principal investigator will be presented in the AE listings. Observed values as well as change from baseline data will be summarized using descriptive statistics. 9.4.2.4. Electrocardiogram Data Standard 12-lead ECG results will be listed for each participant. Descriptive statistics will be calculated for ECG parameters. The incidence of abnormalities, based on the clinical interpretations from the principal investigator, will be summarized. 9.4.2.5. Assessment of Injection Site Data for the assessment of the injection site will be summarized using descriptive statistics. 9.4.3. Other Analyses 9.4.3.1. Disposition of Participants Participants excluded from the analysis sets and data excluded from the PK and PD analysis will be listed including the reason for exclusion. Participant disposition will be summarized. Disposition data will be presented based on all participants randomized (Part A) and enrolled (Part B). 9.4.3.2. Protocol Deviations Protocol deviations will be listed by participant. 9.4.3.3. Analysis of Demographic and Baseline Characteristics Demographic and anthropometric variables (age, sex, ethnicity, race, height, weight, and body mass index) will be listed for each participant. Demographic characteristics (age, sex, ethnicity, and race) and anthropometric characteristics (height, weight, and body mass index) will be summarized by treatment group and for all participants in the safety population.  Medical history data will be listed for each participant including visit, description of the disease/procedure, MedDRA system organ class, MedDRA preferred term, start date, and stop date (or ongoing if applicable). 9.4.3.4. Prior and Concomitant Medication Prior medications are those that started and stopped prior to the dose of study intervention. Concomitant medications are those taken after the first dose (including medications that started prior to dosing and continued after). Prior and concomitant medication will be listed for each participant and will include the following information: reported name, preferred term, the route of administration, dose, frequency, start date/time, duration, and indication. Prior and concomitant medication will be coded according to the World Health Organization Drug Dictionary. 9.4.3.5. Study Intervention Administration A listing of study intervention administration will be created and will include the date and time of administration. When appropriate, a summary table of compliance will also be created. 9.4.3.6. Pharmacokinetic Analysis The PK parameters will be determined by a noncompartmental analysis of serum concentrations for VIS171. No inferential statistical analyses will be performed. Individual and summary tables using descriptive statistics (N, median, mean, standard deviation, percent coefficient of variation [%CV], minimum, and maximum) will be presented for serum concentrations by time point and PK parameters by dose and participant (healthy, disease) group. The individual, mean, and median plots of serum concentrations will also be provided. The impact of ADA response on PK parameters will be evaluated and analyses performed as indicated by the data. 9.4.3.7. Pharmacodynamic Analysis Pharmacodynamics for immune cell types, and other relevant PD applicable markers in serum or appropriate matrix (using the raw data, change from baseline data and percent change from baseline, as appropriate) will be summarized using descriptive statistics and plotted over time. Baseline data will be taken as the last measurement prior to dosing or if not available, the screening value will be used instead.  9.4.3.8. Pharmacokinetic/Pharmacodynamic Analysis Pharmacokinetic/PD modeling may be used for further characterization of data and be reported separately. 9.4.3.9. Immunogenicity Data (Antibody to VIS171) Serum samples will be screened for antibodies binding to VIS171 (ADA) and the titer of confirmed positive samples will be reported. A summary table of confirmed positive or negative ADA will be presented, by treatment (dose of VIS171), and by study day based on the immunogenicity analysis set. In addition, ADA titers will be summarized. 9.4.3.10. Other Endpoint Analysis For Part B, summary statistics will be provided for numeric endpoints and the count and percentage of participants meeting criteria will be provided for categorical endpoints. Details of the analysis of each other endpoint will be provided in the SAP. 9.5. Interim Data Review For Part A, when 100% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days in a cohort, a review of the safety and PD data will be performed by the SMC to confirm the dose for the next cohort. Initiation of Part B and escalation to the next dosing level cohort within Part B will occur after review of available data by the SMC. The SMC will convene for the cohorts when ≥ 50% of participants have completed ≥ 17 days following the last dose in that cohort. Interim summaries of data for entire cohorts may be utilized for various reporting and future study planning purposes at any time prior to full database lock.  10. Supporting Documentation and Operational Considerations 10.1. Appendix 1: Regulatory, Ethical, and Study Oversight Considerations 10.1.1. Regulatory and Ethical Considerations This study will be conducted in accordance with the protocol and with the following:  Consensus ethical principles derived from international guidelines including the Declaration of Helsinki and Council for International Organizations of Medical Sciences (CIOMS) International Ethical Guidelines  Applicable International Council for Harmonisation (ICH) Good Clinical Practice (GCP) Guidelines  Applicable laws and regulations The protocol, protocol amendments, ICF, Investigator Brochure, and other relevant documents (eg, advertisements) must be submitted to an IRB/IEC by the investigator or designee and reviewed and approved by the IRB/IEC before the study is initiated. The protocol is to be followed exactly. To alter the protocol, amendments must be written. Any amendments to the protocol must be released by the responsible staff and receive IEC approval prior to implementation (as appropriate). Administrative changes may be made without the need for a formal amendment, but will also be mentioned in the integrated clinical study report. All amendments will be distributed to all study protocol recipients, with appropriate instructions. Protocols and any substantial amendments to the protocol will require health authority approval prior to initiation except for changes necessary to eliminate an immediate hazard to study participants. The investigator will be responsible for the following:  Providing written summaries of the status of the study to the IRB/IEC annually or more frequently in accordance with the requirements, policies, and procedures established by the IRB/IEC  Notifying the IRB/IEC of SAEs or other significant safety findings as required by IRB/IEC procedures  Providing oversight of the conduct of the study at the site and adherence to requirements of 21 CFR, ICH guidelines, the IRB/IEC, European regulation 536/2014 for clinical studies (if applicable), and all other applicable local regulations  10.1.2. Informed Consent Process Before each participant is enrolled in the clinical study, written informed consent will be obtained from the participant according to the regulatory and legal requirements of the participating country. The investigator or her representative will explain orally and in writing the nature, duration and purpose of the study and the action of the study intervention in such a manner that the participant is aware of the potential risks, inconveniences, or AEs that may occur and answer all questions regarding the study. Participants must be informed that their participation is voluntary. Participants will be required to sign a statement of informed consent that meets the requirements of 21 CFR 50, local regulations, ICH guidelines, Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) requirements, where applicable, and the IRB/IEC or study center. The medical record must include a statement that written informed consent was obtained before the participant was enrolled in the study and the date the written consent was obtained. The authorized person obtaining the informed consent must also sign the ICF. Participants must be re-consented to the most current version of the ICF(s) during their participation in the study. A copy of the ICF(s) must be provided to the participant. The principal investigator will retain a copy as part of the clinical study records. The terms of the consent and when it was obtained must also be documented. Participants who are rescreened are required to sign a new ICF. 10.1.3. Data Protection All clinical study findings and documents will be regarded as confidential. Study documents (protocols, IBs and other material) will be stored appropriately to ensure their confidentiality. The investigator and members of his/her research team (including the IRB/IEC) must not disclose such information without prior written approval from the sponsor, except to the extent necessary to obtain informed consent from participants who wish to participate in the study or to comply with regulatory requirements. The anonymity of participants must be maintained.  Documents that identify the participant (eg, the signed ICF) must be maintained in confidence by the investigator. The participant must be informed that his/her personal study-related data will be used by the sponsor in accordance with local data protection law. The level of disclosure must also be explained to the participant who will be required to give consent for their data to be used as described in the informed consent. The participant must be informed that his/her medical records may be examined by Clinical Quality Assurance auditors or other authorized personnel appointed by the sponsor, by appropriate IRB/IEC members, and by inspectors from regulatory authorities. 10.1.3.1. Participant Identification All screened participants are assigned a unique screening number. The screening numbers identify participants from time of screening until time of enrollment. Participants who drop out of the clinical study before enrollment will retain their screening numbers. 10.1.4. Safety Monitoring Committee The details of the SMC structure and its roles and responsibilities will be documented in the SMC charter. Escalation to a next dosing level will occur after review of the safety and PD data by the SMC as described in Section 4.1.1 (Part A) and Section 4.1.2 (Part B). 10.1.5. Dissemination of Clinical Study Data Dissemination of clinical study data will be per local regulations and sponsor operating procedures. 10.1.6. Data Quality Assurance The investigator must permit study-related monitoring, audits, IEC review, and regulatory agency inspections and provide direct access to source data documents. The monitoring of the study will be conducted under the responsibility of the sponsor by the clinical research organization. The monitor will perform on-site and/or remote monitoring visits as frequently as necessary per the individual study monitoring plan. The principal investigator must prepare and maintain adequate and accurate records of all observations and other data pertinent to the clinical study for each study participant. Frequent communication between the study site and the sponsor is essential to ensure that the safety of the study is monitored adequately. the principal investigator will make all  appropriate safety assessments on an ongoing basis. The medical monitor may review safety information as it becomes available throughout the study. All aspects of the study will be carefully monitored with respect to GCP and standard operating procedures for compliance with applicable government regulations. The study monitor will be an authorized individual designated by the sponsor. The study monitor will have access to all records necessary to ensure integrity of the data and will periodically review the progress of the study with the principal investigator. The sponsor will be entitled to audit the facilities used in the clinical and laboratory parts of the study, as well as to access all the data files pertaining to the study. Similar procedures may also be conducted by agents of any regulatory body, either as part of the national GCP compliance program or to review the results of this study in support of a regulatory submission. The principal investigator should immediately notify the sponsor if they have been contacted by a regulatory/ethics agency concerning an inspection. Records and documents, including signed ICFs, pertaining to the conduct of this study must be retained by the investigator for 2 years after study completion unless local regulations or institutional policies require a longer retention period. No records may be destroyed during the retention period without the written approval of the sponsor. No records may be transferred to another location or party without written notification to the sponsor. 10.1.7. Source Documents Source documents provide evidence for the existence of the participant and substantiate the integrity of the data collected. Source documents are filed at the investigator’s site. Data reported on the case report form (CRF) or entered in the eCRF that are transcribed from source documents must be consistent with the source documents or the discrepancies must be explained. The investigator may need to request previous medical records or transfer records, depending on the study. Also, current medical records must be available. The investigator must maintain accurate documentation (source data) that supports the information entered in the CRF. Study monitors will perform ongoing source data verification to confirm that data entered into the CRF by authorized site personnel are accurate, complete, and verifiable from source documents; that the safety and rights of participants are being protected; and that  the study is being conducted in accordance with the currently approved protocol and any other study agreements, ICH GCP, and all applicable regulatory requirements. 10.1.8. Study and Site Start and Closure Study Start The study start date is the date on which the clinical study will be open for recruitment of participants. Study/Site Termination The sponsor or designee reserves the right to close the study site or terminate the study at any time for any reason at the sole discretion of the sponsor. Study sites will be closed upon study completion. A study site is considered closed when all required documents and study supplies have been collected and a study-site closure visit has been performed. The investigator may initiate study-site closure at any time, provided there is reasonable cause and sufficient notice is given in advance of the intended termination. Reasons for the early closure of a study site by the sponsor or investigator may include but are not limited to: For study termination:  Discontinuation of further study intervention development For site termination:  Failure of the investigator to comply with the protocol, the requirements of the IRB/IEC or local health authorities, the sponsor's procedures, or GCP guidelines  Inadequate or no recruitment (evaluated after a reasonable amount of time) of participants by the investigator  Total number of participants included earlier than expected If the study is prematurely terminated or suspended, the sponsor shall promptly inform the investigators, the IECs/IRBs, the regulatory authorities, and any contract research organization(s) used in the study of the reason for termination or suspension, as specified by the applicable regulatory requirements. The investigator shall promptly inform the participant and should assure appropriate participant therapy and/or follow-up 10.1.9. Publication Policy Authorship for any Otsuka-sponsored publications resulting from the conduct of this study will be based on International Committee of Medical Journal Editors authorship  criteria (http://www.icmje.org/recommendations). According to International Committee of Medical Journal Editors guidelines, one may be considered an author only if the following criteria are met: 1) Substantial contributions to the conception or design of the work; or the acquisition, analysis, or interpretation of data for the work; AND 2) Drafting the work or revising it critically for important intellectual content; AND 3) Final approval of the version to be published; AND 4) Agreement to be accountable for all aspects of the work in ensuring that questions related to the accuracy or integrity of any part of the work are appropriately investigated and resolved. All authors must meet the above criteria, and all who qualify for authorship based on the above criteria should be listed as authors. Investigators or other study participants who do not qualify for authorship may be acknowledged in publications resulting from the study. By agreeing to participate in the study, investigators or other study participants consent to such acknowledgement in any publications resulting from its conduct.  10.2. Appendix 2: Clinical Laboratory Tests The tests detailed in Table 10.2-1 will be performed by the local or central clinical laboratory (as applicable) apart from urinalysis and the urine drug screen which will be performed at the study site. If there is a positive or out of range result for urinalysis, testing will be performed by the local or central clinical laboratory (as applicable) for confirmation. Additional tests may be performed at any time during the study as determined necessary by the investigator or required by local regulations. Investigators must document their review of each laboratory safety report. Table 10.2-1 Clinical Laboratory Tests Laboratory Tests Parameters Basophils (percentage and absolute count) Eosinophils (percentage and absolute count) Hematocrit Hemoglobin Lymphocytes (percentage and absolute count) Mean corpuscular hemoglobin Mean corpuscular hemoglobin concentration Mean corpuscular volume Monocytes (percentage and absolute count) Neutrophils (percentage and absolute count) Platelet count Red blood cell count Red blood cell distribution width Hematology White blood cell count Albumin Alkaline phosphatase ALT AST Calcium Chloride Total cholesterol Creatinine Gamma glutamyl transferase Estimated glomerular filtration rate (calculated using the Chronic Kidney Disease Epidemiology Collaboration equation) Glucose (fasting [8 hours]) Lactate dehydrogenase Phosphorus Potassium Sodium Total bilirubin (if out of range, direct and indirect bilirubin will be measured) Total protein Triglycerides Serum Chemistry Uric acid  Table 10.2-1 Clinical Laboratory Tests Laboratory Tests Parameters Partial thromboplastin time Prothrombin time Coagulation International normalized ratio Bilirubin Blood Creatinine Glucose Ketones Leukocytes Nitrite pH and specific gravity Protein Urobilinogen Urinalysis Microscopic (only for abnormal urine stick test findings) uACRa Albumin and creatinine uPCRb Protein and creatinine HBsAg HBcAb Hepatitis C virus antibody Serologyc HIV enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Amphetamines Barbiturates Benzodiazepines Cannabinoids Cocaine Methylenedioxymethamphetamine Opiates Phencyclidine Urine drug screenb Propoxyphene Pregnancy testing Serum β-hCG/urine dip stick (WOCBP only) Other FSH (screening visit only, limited to female participants in whom nonchildbearing potential needs validation) FSH = follicle stimulating hormone; HBcAb = hepatitis B core antibody; HBsAg = hepatitis B surface antigen. aPart A and Part B (participants with AIH and AA) only. bPart A only. cParticipants with positive HBsAg will be excluded. Participants with a positive HBcAb test must undergo testing for hepatitis B virus DNA; if hepatitis B virus DNA is undetectable, the participant can be included in the study. Participants with a positive anti-hepatitis C virus antibody test must undergo testing for hepatitis C virus RNA; if hepatitis C virus RNA is undetectable, the participant can be included in the study.  10.3. Appendix 3: Adverse Events and Serious Adverse Events: Definitions and Procedures for Recording, Evaluating, Follow-up, and Reporting 10.3.1. Definition of Adverse Event AE Definition  An AE is any untoward medical occurrence in a clinical study participant, temporally associated with the use of study intervention, whether or not considered related to the study intervention.  NOTE: An AE can therefore be any unfavorable and unintended sign (including an abnormal laboratory finding), symptom, or disease (new or exacerbated) temporally associated with the use of study intervention. Events Meeting the AE Definition  Any abnormal laboratory test results (hematology, clinical chemistry, or urinalysis) or other safety assessments (eg, ECG, vital signs measurements), including those that worsen from baseline, considered clinically significant in the medical and scientific judgment of the investigator (ie, not related to progression of underlying disease).  Exacerbation of a chronic or intermittent pre-existing condition including either an increase in frequency and/or intensity of the condition.  New conditions detected or diagnosed after study intervention administration even though it may have been present before the start of the study.  Signs, symptoms, or the clinical sequelae of a suspected intervention- intervention interaction.  Signs, symptoms, or the clinical sequelae of a suspected overdose of either study intervention or a concomitant medication. Overdose per se will not be reported as an AE/SAE unless it is an intentional overdose taken with possible suicidal/self-harming intent. Such overdoses should be reported regardless of sequelae. Events NOT Meeting the AE Definition  Any clinically significant abnormal laboratory findings or other abnormal safety assessments which are associated with the underlying disease, unless judged by the investigator to be more severe than expected for the participant’s condition.  The disease/disorder being studied or expected progression, signs, or symptoms of the disease/disorder being studied, unless more severe than expected for the participant’s condition.   Medical or surgical procedure (eg, endoscopy, appendectomy): the condition that leads to the procedure is the AE.  Situations in which an untoward medical occurrence did not occur (social and/or convenience admission to a hospital).  Anticipated day-to-day fluctuations of pre-existing disease(s) or condition(s) present or detected at the start of the study that do not worsen. 10.3.2. Definition of Serious Adverse Event An SAE is defined as any serious adverse event that, at any dose: a. Results in death b. Is life-threatening The term 'life-threatening' in the definition of 'serious' refers to an event in which the participant was at risk of death at the time of the event. It does not refer to an event, which hypothetically might have caused death, if it were more severe. c. Requires inpatient hospitalization or prolongation of existing hospitalization  In general, hospitalization signifies that the participant has been admitted (usually involving at least an overnight stay) at the hospital or emergency ward for observation and/or treatment that would not have been appropriate in the physician’s office or outpatient setting. Complications that occur during hospitalization are AEs. If a complication prolongs hospitalization or fulfills any other serious criteria, the event is serious. When in doubt as to whether “hospitalization” occurred or was necessary, the AE should be considered serious.  Hospitalization for elective treatment of a pre-existing condition that did not worsen from baseline is not considered an AE. d. Results in persistent or significant disability/incapacity  The term disability means a substantial disruption of a person’s ability to conduct normal life functions.  This definition is not intended to include experiences of relatively minor medical significance such as uncomplicated headache, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, influenza, and accidental trauma (eg, sprained ankle) which may interfere with or prevent everyday life functions but do not constitute a substantial disruption. e. Is a congenital anomaly/birth defect  f. Other important medical events:  Medical or scientific judgment should be exercised by the investigator in deciding whether SAE reporting is appropriate in other situations such as significant medical events that may jeopardize the participant or may require medical or surgical intervention to prevent one of the other outcomes listed in the above definition. These events should usually be considered serious. o Examples of such events include invasive or malignant cancers, intensive treatment for allergic bronchospasm, blood dyscrasias, convulsions or development of intervention dependency or intervention abuse. 10.3.3. Definition of Immediately Reportable Event Immediately Reportable Event Definition  Any SAE  Any AE related to occupational exposure  Potential serious hepatotoxicity (see Section 8.3.8)  Pregnancies are also defined as IREs. Although normal pregnancy is not an AE, it will mandate study intervention discontinuation and must be reported on an IRE form and the Pregnancy Surveillance Form(s) to the sponsor. This includes pregnancy of the participant or the partner of the participant. Pregnancy will only be documented on the AE eCRF if the pregnancy occurs in a female participant and there is an abnormality or complication. 10.3.4. Recording and Follow-Up of AE and/or SAE AE and SAE Recording  When an AE/SAE occurs, it is the responsibility of the investigator to review all documentation (eg, hospital progress notes, laboratory reports, and diagnostics reports) related to the event.  The investigator will then record all relevant AE/SAE information.  It is not acceptable for the investigator to send photocopies of the participant’s medical records to the sponsor or contract research organization (CRO) safety designee in lieu of completion of the required form.  There may be instances when copies of medical records for certain cases are requested by the sponsor or CRO safety designee. In this case, all participant identifiers, with the exception of the participant number, will be redacted on the copies of the medical records before submission to the sponsor or CRO safety designee.  The investigator will attempt to establish a diagnosis of the event based on signs, symptoms, and/or other clinical information. Whenever possible, the diagnosis (not the individual signs/symptoms) will be documented as the AE/SAE.  Assessment of Intensity The investigator will make an assessment of intensity for each AE and SAE reported during the study and assign it to 1 of the following categories:  Mild: An event that is easily tolerated by the participant, causing minimal discomfort and not interfering with everyday activities.  Moderate: An event that causes sufficient discomfort to interfere with normal everyday activities.  Severe: An event that prevents normal everyday activities. An AE that is assessed as severe should not be confused with an SAE. Severe is a category utilized for rating the intensity of an event; and both AEs and SAEs can be assessed as severe. An event is defined as ‘serious’ when it meets at least 1 of the predefined outcomes as described in the definition of an SAE, NOT when it is rated as severe. Assessment of Causality  The investigator is obligated to assess the relationship between study intervention and each occurrence of each AE/SAE.  A “reasonable possibility” of a relationship conveys that there are facts, evidence, and/or arguments to suggest a causal relationship, rather than a relationship cannot be ruled out.  The investigator will use clinical judgment to determine the relationship.  Alternative causes, such as underlying disease(s), concomitant therapy, and other risk factors, as well as the temporal relationship of the event to study intervention administration will be considered and investigated.  The investigator will also consult the IB in his/her assessment.  For each AE/SAE, the investigator must document in the medical notes that he/she has reviewed the AE/SAE and has provided an assessment of causality.  There may be situations in which an SAE has occurred and the investigator has minimal information to include in the initial report to the sponsor or CRO safety designee. However, it is very important that the investigator always make an assessment of causality for every event before the initial transmission of the SAE data to the sponsor or CRO safety designee.  The investigator may change his/her opinion of causality in light of follow-up information and send an SAE follow-up report with the updated causality assessment.  The causality assessment is one of the criteria used when determining regulatory reporting requirements.  Follow-up of AEs and SAEs  The investigator is obligated to perform or arrange for the conduct of supplemental measurements and/or evaluations as medically indicated or as requested by the sponsor or CRO safety designee to elucidate the nature and/or causality of the AE or SAE as fully as possible. This may include additional laboratory tests or investigations, histopathological examinations, or consultation with other health care professionals.  If a participant dies during participation in the study or during a recognized follow-up period, the investigator will provide a copy of any postmortem findings to the sponsor or CRO safety designee including histopathology.  New or updated information will be recorded in the originally submitted documents.  The investigator will submit any updated SAE data within 24 hours of receipt of the information. 10.3.5. Reporting of Immediately Reportable Events IRE Reporting via an Electronic Data Collection Tool  The primary mechanism for reporting an IRE will be the electronic data collection tool.  If the electronic system is unavailable, then the site will use the paper IRE data collection tool (see next section) to report the event within 24 hours.  The site will enter the IRE data into the electronic system as soon as it becomes available.  After the study is completed at a given site, the electronic data collection tool will be taken off-line to prevent the entry of new data or changes to existing data.  If a site receives a report of a new IRE from a study participant or receives updated data on a previously reported IRE after the electronic data collection tool has been taken off-line, then the site can report this information on a paper IRE form (see next section) or to the medical monitor by telephone.  The contact for IRE reporting is provided in Section 10.3.6.  IRE Reporting via Paper Data Collection Tool  If the electronic system is unavailable, facsimile transmission of the IRE paper data collection tool is acceptable.  In rare circumstances and in the absence of facsimile equipment, notification by telephone is acceptable with a copy of the IRE data collection tool sent by overnight mail or courier service.  Initial notification via telephone does not replace the need for the investigator to complete and sign the IRE data collection tool within the designated reporting time frames.  The contact for IRE reporting is provided in Section 10.3.6. 10.3.6. Contact for IRE Reporting PAREXEL Pharmacovigilance Safety Services Fax: +1-781-434-5957 E mail: NorthAmerica_Medical@parexel.com  10.4. Appendix 4: Contraceptive and Barrier Guidance 10.4.1. Definitions Woman of Childbearing Potential Women in the following categories are considered WOCBP (fertile): 1. Following menarche 2. From the time of menarche until becoming postmenopausal unless permanently sterile (see below)  A postmenopausal state is defined as no menses for 2 years without an alternative medical cause.  A high follicle stimulating hormone (FSH) level in the postmenopausal range may be used to confirm a postmenopausal state in women not using hormonal contraception or hormonal replacement therapy (HRT). However, in the absence of 12 months of amenorrhea, confirmation with more than one FSH measurement (> 40 IU/L or mIU/mL) is required.  Females on HRT and whose menopausal status is in doubt will be required to use one of the nonestrogen hormonal highly effective contraception methods if they wish to continue their HRT during the study. Otherwise, they must discontinue HRT to allow confirmation of postmenopausal status before study enrollment.  Surgical sterilization methods (for the purpose of this study) include:  Documented hysterectomy  Documented bilateral salpingectomy  Documented bilateral oophorectomy For individuals with permanent infertility due to an alternate medical cause other than the above, (eg, Mullerian agenesis, androgen insensitivity, gonadal dysgenesis), investigator discretion should be applied to determining study entry. Note: Documentation can come from the site personnel’s review of the participant’s medical records, medical examination, or medical history interview. If fertility is unclear (eg, amenorrhea in adolescents or athletes) and a menstrual cycle cannot be confirmed before first dose of study intervention, additional evaluation should be considered.  10.4.2. Contraception Guidance Contraception (described below) is required from the period prior to study enrollment until 30 days following the last dose of study intervention for female participants, and during the study until 90 days following the last dose of study intervention for male participants. CONTRACEPTIVESa ALLOWED DURING THE STUDY INCLUDE: Highly Effective Methodsb That Have Low User Dependency  Implantable progestogen-only hormone contraception associated with inhibition of ovulationc  Intrauterine device  Intrauterine hormone-releasing systemc  Bilateral tubal occlusion  Azoospermic partner (vasectomized or due to a medical cause) Azoospermia is a highly effective contraceptive method provided that the partner is the sole sexual partner of the WOCBP and the absence of sperm has been confirmed. If not, an additional highly effective method of contraception should be used. Spermatogenesis cycle is approximately 90 days. Note: documentation of azoospermia for a male participant can come from the site personnel’s review of the participant’s medical records, medical examination, or medical history interview. Highly Effective Methods2 That Are User Dependent Combined (estrogen- and progestogen-containing) hormonal contraception associated with inhibition of ovulation3  Oral  Intravaginal  Transdermal Progestogen-only hormone contraception associated with inhibition of ovulation3  Oral  Injectable Sexual abstinence Sexual abstinence is considered a highly effective method only if defined as refraining from heterosexual intercourse during the entire period of risk associated with the study intervention. The reliability of sexual abstinence needs to be evaluated in relation to the duration of the study and the preferred and usual lifestyle of the participant.  a) Contraceptive use by men or women should be consistent with local regulations regarding the use of contraceptive methods for those participating in clinical studies. b) Failure rate of < 1% per year when used consistently and correctly. Typical use failure rates differ from those when used consistently and correctly. c) Male condoms must be used in addition to hormonal contraception. Note: Periodic abstinence (calendar, symptothermal, post-ovulation methods), withdrawal (coitus interruptus), and lactational amenorrhea method are not acceptable methods of contraception for this study. Additionally, the following methods are not considered highly effective:  Progesterone-only oral hormonal contraception, where inhibition of ovulation is not the primary mode of action  Male or female condom with or without spermicide  Cap, diaphragm, or sponge with spermicide While these are allowed in the study, they are not acceptable as sole methods of contraception for this study. Note: Male condom and female condom should not be used together (due to risk of failure from friction).  10.5. Appendix 5: Injection Site Assessment Local Reaction to Injectable Product Mild (Grade 1) Moderate (Grade 2) Severe (Grade 3) Potentially Life-threatening (Grade 4) Tenderness Mild discomfort to touch Discomfort with movement Significant discomfort at rest Emergency room visit or hospitalization Erythema/Redness 2.5 - 5 cm 5.1 - 10 cm > 10 cm Necrosis or exfoliative dermatitis Induration/Swelling 2.5 - 5 cm and does not interfere with activity 5.1 - 10 cm or interferes with activity > 10 cm or prevents daily activity Necrosis  10.6. Appendix 6: Abbreviations Abbreviation Definition %CV Percent coefficient of variation AA Alopecia areata ACR American College of Rheumatology ADA Anti-drug antibody AE Adverse event AIH Autoimmune hepatitis ALP Alkaline phosphatase ALT Alanine transaminase AST Aspartate transaminase AUC∞ Area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to infinity AUClast Area under the concentration-time curve from time zero to the last observable concentration AUCtau Area under the concentration-time curve over the dosing interval at steady-state CBC Complete blood count CD Cluster of differentiation CIOMS Council for International Organizations of Medical Sciences CKD-EPI Chronic Kidney Disease Epidemiology Collaboration ClinRO Clinician Reported Outcomes for eyelashes and eyebrows Cmax Maximum (peak) plasma drug concentration CONSORT Consolidated Standards of Reporting Trials COVID-19 Coronavirus Disease 2019 CRF Case report form CRO Contract research organization D Day DBP Diastolic blood pressure DNCB Dinitrochlorobenzene DPCP Diphenylcyclopropenone ds-DNA Double-stranded deoxyribonucleic acid EC50 Half maximal effective concentration ECG Electrocardiogram eCRF Electronic case report form eGFR Estimated glomerular filtration rate Fc Fragment crystallizable FIH First-in-human FOXP3 Forkhead box protein P3 FSGS Focal segmental glomerulosclerosis FSH Follicle stimulating hormone GCP Good Clinical Practice GLP Good Laboratory Practice HBcAb Hepatitis B core antibody HBsAg Hepatitis B surface antigen  Abbreviation Definition HIPAA Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act HIV Human immunodeficiency virus HRT Hormone replacement therapy IB Investigator’s Brochure ICF Informed consent form ICH International Council for Harmonisation IEC Independent Ethics Committees IgG Immunoglobulin G (IgG1) IL-2 Interleukin-2 IMP Investigational medicinal product IRB Institutional Review Boards IRE Immediately reportable event IV Intravenous IVRS Interactive Voice Response System IWRS Interactive Web Response System LFT Liver function test MABEL Minimally active biological effect level MAD Multiple ascending dose MedDRA Medical Dictionary for Regulatory Activities MFI Median fluorescence intensity N/A Not applicable NIMP Noninvestigational medicinal product NK Natural killer NOAEL No observed adverse effect level NSAIDs Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs PBMC Peripheral blood mononuclear cells PD Pharmacodynamic(s) PK Pharmacokinetic(s) PUVA Psoralen plus UV-A QTcF QT interval corrected for heart rate using Fridericia’s correction RNA Ribonucleic acid RT-PCR Reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction SAD Single ascending dose SAE Serious adverse event SBP Systolic blood pressure SALT Severity of Alopecia Tool SAP Statistical analysis plan SC Subcutaneous SDC Simplified diagnostic criteria SELENA Safety of Estrogens in Lupus Erythematosus: National Assessment SLE Systemic lupus erythematosus SLEDAI Systemic Lupus Erythematosus Disease Activity Index SMC Safety Monitoring Committee SUSAR Suspected unexpected serious adverse reactions  Abbreviation Definition TB Tuberculosis TEAE Treatment-emergent adverse event Teff Effector T cell(s) tmax Time of maximum (peak) plasma drug concentration Treg Regulatory T cell(s) uACR Urine albumin/creatinine ratio ULN Upper limit of normal uPCR Urine protein/creatinine ratio WOCBP Women of childbearing potential β-hCG Beta-human chorionic gonadotropin  